Foreign     Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 12, 
23 March 1994. 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical i?sues 
                                                             ? 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investnient. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   ALBANIA 
   FORTY PRIVATE CONSTRUCTION FIRMS ACTIVE IN SHKODER:  Following 
the private trade sector, the construction sector has undergone a 
active development in Shkoder.  Currently, there are 40 private 
construction firms active in this region.  They are involved with 
the construction of buildings in the city and are trying to complete 
the construction of apartments financed by the National Buildings 
Institute.  These companies are also involved in roads and works of 
art as well.  One of the companies has been working for several 
months on the renovation of the former Labor Party Central Committee 
building, to be turned into part of the Luigj Gurakuqi University. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1129 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   CABINET VIEWS FOREIGN DEBT NEGOTIATIONS, BUDGET EXPENSES:  The 
Council of Ministers has been discussing a draft decision on a 
response to the Paris Club regarding extending repayment of the 
country's public debts.  Albanian Bank Governor Dylber Vrioni, who 
also holds the post of chairman of the Committee for Negotiation of 
External Debt, spoke in detail about the Committee's work to find 
ways to pay off the public debts that Albania owes Germany, France, 
Austria, Italy, and the Netherlands.  In accordance with the terms 
put forward by the Paris Club, which were approved by the Council of 
Ministers, the repayment of Albania's public debts, which make up a 
fifth of the country's external debt, should be completed within 
seven years from mid-1996.  Concerning the other part of the 
external debt, which Albania owes to foreign private banks, the 
cabinet stressed the preliminary phase, but there are good hopes for 
a quick solution in the future.  The Council of Ministers approved a 
preliminary draft of the budget to the middle of March 1994, which 
will pave the way for budgetary institutions to operate until 
parliament approves a draft law in 1994.  Finally, they reached a 
cooperation agreement between the Albanian National Conipany and the 
Croatian company, Ina, on the exploration, processing, and 
production of hydroxides.  (Tirana ATA in English 0925 GMT 26 Feb 94 
AU) 

   1993 ALBANIAN IMPORTS INCREASE:  The total value of Albanian 
imports during 1993 was 42.1 billion leks or 29 billion more than in 
1992.  Private imports accounted for the major part with 28 billion 
of the total.  The main countries from which Albania imported goods 
were Italy, Greece, Germany, and France.  In 1993, goods worth 
18.888 billion leks were imported from Italy, mainly foodstuffs such 
as meat, flour, vegetable oil, and sugar, while goods worth 10.545 
billion came from Greece, mainly tractors, machinery, and electrical 
appliances.  Some 12,500 tons of oranges were imported from Greece, 
though the southern Albanian coast has many citrus plantations of 
its own.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 26 Feb 94 AU) 

   BRITISH PETROLEUM TO OPEN AIRPORT FUEL STATION:  British 
Petroleum, one of the world's largest companies, will open the first 
petrol station to supply aircraft in Rinas Airport.  This joint 
venture has been due to an agreement between two companies, British 
Petroleum and Petrol Impex of Albania.  The petrol station will be 
constructed soon and is expected to open by mid-March.  (Tirana ATA 
in English 1141 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   CABINET APPROVES AMENDMENTS TO LAWS, BILATERAL AGREEMENTS:  The 
government has approved an agreement between the Republics of 
Albania and Malaysia on the promotion and protection of investment 
and an agreement between the Governments of Albania and Croatia on 
educational, cultural and scientific cooperation as well as on 
mutual removal of visas between the two countries.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1128 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   BILATERAL AGREEMENTS SIGNED WITH CROATIAN DELEGATION:  Several 
bilateral agreements were signed at the Palace of Congresses and 
Foreign Ministry today between the Albanian and Croatian 
delegations.  The agreement on cooperation in the field of tourism 
between the Government of the Republic of Albania and the Government 
of Croatia was signed by Ministers Spaho and Bulic.  The agreement 
on petroleum research in land between the National Agency of 
Hydrocarbons and Croatian National Company Ina Naf t Plin was signed 
by Fatbardh Ademi and Franjo Gregoric.  Presidents Berisha and 
Tudjman were present at the signing ceremony.  (Tirana TVSH 
Television Network in Albanian 1900 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   CABINET ADOPTS BILLS; AGREEMENTS WITH FRANCE, GERMANY:  The Prime 
Minister's Press and Information Office reports that on Monday the 
Council of Ministers approved several draft laws and decisions.  At 
today's meeting, the Council of Ministers discussed and approved the 
draft law on medications.  The bill defines the means of production 
and registration of medicaments, their marketing, as well as their 
import and export.  Later, the Albanian Government approved in 
principle a draft treaty of understanding and friendship between the 
Republic of Albania and the Republic of France.  The treaty 
provisions comprise commitment from both sides on political, 
economical, and cultural cooperation, as well as the exchange of 
experience between the Albanian and French Parliaments, local 
authorities, and the fields of legislation, industry, mining, 
agriculture, technology, tourism, culture, science, and social 
matters.  The government also approved an agreement between the 
Republic of Albania and the Federal Republic of Germany for 
financial cooperation regarding projects on private agriculture and 
the extension of communal infrastructure.  The approval of the 
project decision on the free of charge circulation of the material 
values covers the problems related to the values circulation within 
the system of the Ministry of Defense, the Ministry of Public Order, 
and the financial and forestry policies.  The Council of Ministers 
approved a draft decision presented by the Finance Ministry on the 
Law for Documenting and Keeping Tax Records.  The Albanian 
Government approved a decision to grant land to 427 peasant families 
living within the territory of the Ksamil Agricultural Enterprise in 
Sarande district.  (Tirana ATA in English 1116 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   WINNING TENDER FOR TIRANA WATER SUPPLY PROJECT:  The commission 
set up by Tirana municipality announced the project of the Albanian 
private firm ''Huk-Project'' as the winner of the tender for the 
improvement of Tirana's water supply.  Astrit Hana, Public Services 
director in Tirana Municipality, told an ATA reporter that the 
project foresees the increase of the water quantity with 400 liters 
per second after the sinking of wells in Laknas-Vore area, which 
will be worth some 312 million leks.  The project of the "Huk- 
Project" firm aims to partially improve the water supply for Tirana, 
so as to pass the phase of emergency due to the increase of 
population and the number of the private shops opened during the 
last years.  The final solution will be achieved only in 1996, when 
the water pipe-line in Bovilla will start to function.  (Tirana ATA 
in English 1316 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   JOINT VENTURES FOR CLEANING TIRANA STREETS:  The grave situation 
created in Tirana due to dirty streets and the mass of unremoved 
filth is expected to change completely next month.  Astrit Hana, 
director of Public Services in Tirana municipality, said to ATA that 
the contracts with foreign firms, which won the tender organized by 
the municipality for the best Tirana cleaning project, will be 
signed within the first 15 days this month.  Tehnokomerc, a Slovene- 
Austrian firm, and Nuova Ekolega, an Italian firm, will create joint 
ventures with the existing domestic units to for city cleaning. 
Tirana's rural territory will be divided into two areas and one of 
the joint ventures will work in each of them.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1108 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   MALESI E MADHE PRIVATE FARMERS BUYING TRACTORS:  The Regional 
Department of Agriculture and Food reports that during the last two 
years, the private farmers in Malesi e Madhe have bought 245 
tractors.  The increasing number of the tractors has led to a 
decrease in land tariffs and other agricultural services.  Malesi e 
Madhe is a mountainous area north of Albania and one of the 
country's poorest provinces.  (Tirana ATA in English 1304 GMT 18 Feb 
94 AU) 

   PRIVATE FURNITURE FACTORY IN DURRES:  Two years ago, some Durres 
specialists of various professions, such as engineers, doctors, and 
economists set up the private firm "Ada," which mostly deals with 
the import of domestic electric facilities.  Now, the firm has 
extended its activity even in the field of production.  A small 
furniture factory, supplied with foreign technology and raw material 
and with a staff of 11 workers and specialists, has started to 
manufacture furniture, cupboards, and domestic facilities, which 
bear the seal of Ada.  Bujar Bajramaj, the firm's president, told an 
ATA reporter that $45,000 have been invested for the construction of 
this factory and the salaries vary from 7,000 leks monthly for 
workers to 13,000 leks monthly for specialists.  The advantages of 
the productions of this firm to those imported are the prices, which 
are 30-40 percent lower, as well as the employment of Albanian 
specialists.  The firm is prepared to set up a money exchange agency 
and aims to start some productive and elaborate activities in food 
industry.  (Tirana ATA in English 1123 GMT 20 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT IN ELBASAN:  Xhelil Kaci, chief of the Foreign 
Economic Relations Department in Elbasan Municipality, told an ATA 
reporter that 15 foreign investors have so far started their 
activity in Elbasan, city in central Albania.  Kaci mentioned four 
wood factories, a tobacco plant, a soap and oil enterprise, and two 
clothing production enterprises.  Kaci said that there are also some 
other enterprises, which work with ordered material, such as the 
Carpet and Clothing Enterprise, which has so far employed 700 
workers, as well as oil supply centers that will be built by foreign 
capital.  Total investments reach $7 million, out of which $3.5 
million for the reconstruction of the Wood Processing Plant by an 
Italian company, $1.8 million for the Tobacco Plant by a Greek 
company, and $700,000 for building an oil supply center, undertaken 
by a Slovene company.  Some 70 percent of foreign companies have 
invested in productive fields.  (Tirana ATA in English 1120 GMT 20 
Feb 94 AU) 

   DHL TO EXPAND ACTIVITY IN ALBANIA:  At a news conference held 
last week in Tirana, DHL representatives in Albania confirmed that 
65 percent of DHL post services are carried out by Albanians and 35 
percent by foreigners, who are performing activity or live in 
Albania.  They stressed that during last year, DHL has carried out 
services of 9,000 letters and packages of various sizes.  This year, 
the DHL's activity in Albania will be twice greater and will be 
extended in other regions, too, such as in Fier, Shkoder, Elbasan, 
and Korce.  DHL started its activity in Albania a year ago, and the 
Albanians are making good use of it, though its service tariffs are 
high compared to the country's living level.  (Tirana ATA in English 
0913 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   PRIVATE CLOTHING PRODUCTION ENTERPRISE IN FIER:  In cooperation 
with the powerful Italian firm Eldo S.P.A, the Fier businessman 
Krijenko Memo established a private clothing production enterprise 
named Luck.  (Tirana ATA in English 1133 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES DRAFT LAWS ON DUTIES, IMPORTS:  Upon the 
president of the republic's proposal, yesterday the People's 
Assembly approved some draft laws and decrees amending Laws on 
Custom Taxes, Tariffs.  It also approved an annual tax on vehicle 
registration, which will be different depending on the kind of 
vehicle.  The tax will vary from 500 to 7,000 leks.  An amendment to 
Article 17 of the Law on Customs Tariffs will discontinue the 
phenomenon of artificially decreasing customs values, which is 
observed in the custom-houses.  The Assembly also adopted two other 
decrees proposed by the president of the republic; one on exempting 
from customs taxes those commodities imported in conformity with the 
projects of granting credits under facilitated conditions, and the 
other on decreasing the customs tariffs on imported cheniical 
fertilizers, froni 30 to 5 percent.  (Tirana ATA in English 1109 GMT 
10 Feb 94 AU) 

   ELBASAN COMBINE RESUMES PRODUCTION OF STEEL:  On 9 February, 
GAZETA SHQIPTARE writes that the former Steelworks Plant in Elbasan 
city, central Albania, has been already divided into three subplants 
-- the hydro-metallurgical, energy, and siderotic divisions.  The 
newspaper comments that this solution has enabled the greatest 
factory of Albanian industry to start producing steel.  The 
siderotic subplant director says that "special sectors are operating 
normally although the technology is generally out of date and cannot 
resist time.  Actually, Albanian steel is being produced in electric 
furnaces, using scrap iron as raw material.  Specialists believe 
that since the scrap iron is considerable and electric energy is 
cheap in Albania, foreign investment will be high in this field.  So 
far, an Italian company has granted $1.3 million.  Steel turned out 
by the Steelworks Plant has met the demands of domestic consumers, 
i.e. different construction companies.  The siderotic subplant 
started to produce in October 1992 and has employed 2,500 workers so 
far.  (Tirana ATA in English 1115 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES LOWER DUTY ON FERTILIZERS:  At today's plenary 
setting, the Assembly approved the president's decree on an 
amendment to custom tariffs.  Based on this decree, the custom 
tariffs on azo fertilizers will be decreased from 30 to 5 percent. 
This will promote private farmers to raise agricultural production. 
The high protectionist tax on azo fertilizers is already of no value 
because the fertilizer plants in Albania are out of work.  The new 
tariff will influence the rise of national incomes and agricultural 
production.  (Tirana ATA in English 0911 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT DATA UNRELIABLE:  Mr. Hasan Carcani, director at 
Labor Department in the Ministry of Labor and Social Assistance, 
told an ATA reporter that extravagant figures are given regarding 
unemployment in Albania.  It is impossible to give real figures on 
the number of the unemployed in Albania because many people who are 
in private business are not registered as such, some others have 
cars and use them as taxis without licenses, and furthermore, there 
are Albanians who "emigrate" illegally every day.  Mr. Carcani says 
that even people who are employed in the administration and state 
enterprises are included in the lists of persons registered in labor 
offices.  To be able to face the abuses, the Ministry of Labor and 
Social Assistance will soon send an order to labor offices clearly 
defining the criteria that unemployed citizens should meet in order 
to be registered as such.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 11 Feb 94 
AU) 

   GLUT OF IMPORTED MACAR0NI HURTS DOMESTIC PRODUCERS: Some 60 tons 
of stockpiled macaroni have remained in the storage-houses of 
Macaroni Factory in Berat.  Consequently, production is blocked and 
50 factory workers are likely to lose their jobs.  Specialists say 
that the market is oversupplied with iniported macaroni from Italy, 
Bulgaria, and Greece, and that is why stockpiles of Albanian 
macaroni are created.  (Tirana ATA in English 1124 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   COUNCIL APPROVES SHKODER DEVELOPMENT PLAN:  The Territory 
Management Council recently approved a plan to regulate Shkoder 
city.  The plan foresees urban development over the 20 next years. 
Specialists say this plan is in full conformity with the new 
economical and social conditions and will bring about many changes 
in the citizens' lifestyles, as well as completing and improving 
accommodation according to the residents' wishes.  Juli Shllaku, 
specialist at the Territory Management Directorate, said the plan 
will raise the population density from 136 to 250 residents per 
hectare.  The plan is also based on the development perspective of 
the city within its limited territory.  As for the private 
buildings, the plan foresees to give away the free existing areas in 
the city, in which the population density will be 200 residents per 
hectare.  (Tirana ATA in English 1116 GMT 12 Feb 94 AU) 

   RINAS AIRPORT MODERNIZATION CONTRACT SIGNED WITH SIEMENS:  On 11 
February, the Albanian Albtransport Enterprise in Tirana and the 
National Agency of Air Traffic in Rinas signed a contract with the 
German firm Siemens A.G. Erlangen for the first phase of the 
modernization and reconstruction of Rinas airport.  Ferdinand 
Petrela, Albtransport director, said that after the contract, we 
will immediately start negotiations on signing a financial agreement 
with the banks that will provide the necessary credit to finance the 
contract.  (Tirana ATA in English 1114 GMT 13 Feb 94 AU) 

   TWELVE THOUSAND FAMILIES REQUEST RELOCATION:  Some 12,000 
families, mainly from the northern part of the country, have asked 
for a change of residence because they have remained without land 
due to natural disasters, floods from the waters of lakes and hydro- 
power stations, etc.  On 18 October last year, the Albanian 
Government approved a decision to set up a commission that will 
study the problem and try to find possible ways to answer the 
requests of the families who want to change residence.  Aleksander 
Mara, director of Vegetable Production Directorate in the Ministry 
of Agriculture and Food, told an ATA reporter that it is too 
difficult to find a proper solution to such a problem.  In the first 
phase, the commission is thinking about the establishment of some 
families in those areas where, after the distribution of the land 
according to the present law, free arable land has remained, 
especially from the land of the former agricultural enterprises. 
According to this official, the Albanian state has to give millions 
of leks to these families, but such funds are far too limited at 
present.  The free movement of the people, a well-known phenomenon 
in Albania only in the last three years, is still limited due to the 
hard economic situation.  (Tirana ATA in English 1114 GMT 14  Feb 94 
AU) 

   DURRES HOUSING CONSTRUCTION:  Tomorr Golemi, head of the Durres 
municipality, told an ATA reporter that a total of 500 apartments 
are under construction and will be completed within 1994.  The 
apartments are being constructed to help the 1,200 families that are 
now living in buildings returned to their former owners.  Mr. Golemi 
said that 400 apartments will be constructed from state funds, 
adding that the construction of 65 house units will be covered by 
the amount of money from the privatization of the present 
apartments.  Some of the new apartments will be given to the 
families of former persecutees.  The Durres municipality has asked 
the Ministry of Agriculture and Food for two buildings that can be 
adopted as dwelling places.  (Tirana ATA in English 1119 GMT 14 Feb 
94 AU) 

   BURREL FERRO-CHROMIUM PLANT INCREASES PRODUCTION:  The Ferro- 
Chromium Plant in Burrel, eastern north of Albania, increased its 
January production by 80 tons, Tonin Gjoni, the plant director, told 
an ATA reporter.  In January, the total production amounted to 1,980 
tons or 17 percent more than the same period of 1993 [all figures as 
received].  This will supplement the Albchromium production program. 
Mr. Gjoni said that we have signed contracts with five companies to 
sell our products.  During the next three months we will reconstruct 
technological furnace No. 1, following an agreement with the U.S. 
Company Hackslay Bater to invest $1 million, while the Croatian 
Company Dalmatia Dugirat will implement the project.  Last year, the 
Ferro-Chromium Plant in Burrel covered 80 percent of production in 
the Mat District.  The figure exceeds the production program of the 
Albchromium state company by 9 percent.  (Tirana ATA in English 1122 
GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   ELBASAN WOOD PLANT IN JOINT VENTURE WITH ITALIAN FIRM:  The 
region of Apulia in Italy took the initiative to extend economic 
relations with Albania through investments and other forms of 
business and trade.  The firm Nettis Impianti, with Giuseppe Nettis 
as president, has established cooperation with the former wood plant 
in Elbasan, thus establishing a joint venture called Italdruri. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1124 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   SOROS FOUNDATION DONATES COMPUTERS TO TIRANA UNIVERSITY:  In the 
framework of the continuation of its program for high schools, the 
Soros Foundation donated 45 computers with printers to Tirana 
University.  (Tirana ATA in English 1305 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY APPROVES BILL ON CUSTOMS TARIFFS:  On 14 February, the 
People's Assembly discussed and approved the draft law on customs 
tariffs, according to which taxes will be imposed on imports of 
grain and flour.  These goods will have a 5 percent custom tax and a 
5 percent surtax.  No taxes will be paid on the grain and flour that 
will continue to be imported in the framework of aid or governmental 
agreements.  The parliament has adopted some amendments even to the 
tax imposed on used cars, depending on the mileage.  The parliament 
also discussed the draft law on some amendments to the Law on 
Traffic Taxes.  (Tirana ATA in English 1121 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   AGENCY REPORTS 27,500 'UNITS' PRIVATIZED SO FAR:  The National 
Privatization Agency reports that some 27,500 units have been 
privatized so far.  The agency statistics confirm an $17 million 
input into the state budget through privatization.  In the first six 
months of 1993 alone, 710 large units and enterprises were 
privatized, thus representing 80 percent of the monetary value 
cashed during the 1993 period.  Efforts to privatize 7,000 objects 
are presently under way.  Food, clothing, and construction 
enterprises are increasing their demands for privatization.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1123 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   DUTCH AID FOR FIER AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT CENTER:  An 
agricultural development center will be created in Fier with the 
support of a Dutch firm.  In this context, an agreement of 
understanding with partners in the Dutch Ministry of Agriculture, 
Food and Fishing was signed.  Rakip Kryeziu High Agricultural 
School, which will be completely reconstructed, will be the pillar 
of this center for agricultural development.  The investments will 
be mainly allocated to modernize the school conditions, raise the 
level of lessons, and improve the cattle stocks and plant stocks of 
the school.  In the context of this cooperation, three demonstration 
centers in the form of private firms may also be built in the near 
feature.  (Tirana ATA in English 1119 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   SATELLITE RECEIVER STATION TO BE SET UP IN DURRES:  A satellite 
receiver station will be soon set up in Durres, a city 30 kilometers 
from Tirana.  After organizing a poll of specialists and citizens of 
different ages, the city municipality presented the applications of 
various firms that will compete in the tender for the satellite 
station.  This will make it possible for people to watch satellite 
programs broadcast by some renowned television stations such as CNN, 
MTV, and some serious Italian television channels.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1309 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   BULGARIA 

   HEALTH MINISTRY TO CONTROL MEDICINES:  The Ministry of Health 
intends to regulate the import and distribution of pharmaceuticals. 
At a news briefing on 23 February the ministry announced that its 
experts have prepared a draft decree specifying the terms for 
issuing licenses to manufacturers and wholesalers of medicines. 
According to the ministry's experts, the market in medicines has 
been too liberal since 1991, and requires state control.  According 
to the ministry, there are more than 400 wholesale importers and 
distributors at the moment, far too many for a small country like 
Bulgaria.  The number is expected to drop following the introduction 
of a 10,000-leva licensing fee and as soon as the regulations for 
trade and storage of pharmaceuticals have been determined.  The 
decree provides no special mechanism to protect Bulgarian 
manufacturers.  The higher taxes and customs duties charged on 
imported medicines are supposed to provide sufficient protection for 
local manufacturers.  Bulgarian manufacturers of medicines will be 
obliged to make them in accordance with the regulations applicable 
in the EU and worldwide.  (Sofia BTA in English 1701 GMT 23 Feb 94 
AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION FALLS SHARPLY:  In 1993 agricultural 
production accounted for 9.6 percent of GDP, compared with 11 
percent in 1992, according to the National Statistical Institute 
(NSI) on 24 February.  State-owned, private, and cooperative farms 
saw a slump in the output of all crops except wheat, which went up 
by 240,000 tons.  In 1993 the average annual earnings of the 677,000 
persons employed in farming was 26,440 leva.  There was no fall in 
the number of farm workers compared with 1992.  There was a sharp 
drop in livestock numbers:  Cattle went down by 70,000, pigs by 
608,000, sheep by 1,050,000, and poultry by 660,000. This brought 
about a slump in the output of milk, eggs, wool and other stock- 
breeding products.  About 40.5 percent of all former landowners had 
their land back by 25 January 1994.  The figure includes those given 
land for temporary use.  However, the land is much fragmented: 
Statistical data on land use show that plots measuring 0.1 to 1 
hectares (ha) account for 91 percent of the land; plots of 1.1 to 5 
ha, 8.5 percent; 5.1 to 10 ha, 0.47 percent; plots over 10 ha, only 
0.03 percent.  (Sofia BTA in English 1505 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE TALKS HELD WITH BELGIUM:  Bilateral relations and prospects 
for cooperation between Bulgaria and Belgium were discussed on 25 
February at a regular meeting of the Bulgarian-Belgian Mixed 
Committee on Economic, Industrial, Trade, and Technical Cooperation. 
The committee's cochairmen are Edmond de Wilde, minister 
plenipotentiary and director for Eastern Europe at Belgium's Foreign 
Trade Ministry, and Vladimir Kisyov, chief of the International 
Integration and Coordination Department with Bulgaria's Industry 
Ministry.   The Bulgarian side sought Belgian help in the 
fulfillment of procedural requirements for the ratification of 
Bulgaria's association agreement with the EC and in the talks on 
Bulgaria's association with GATT and other international 
organizations.  The Bulgarian side also requested support for its 
claim for compensation for damage suffered in enforcing sanctions 
against Serbia and Montenegro. 

   Bulgarian exports to Belgium account for about 10 percent of 
total exports to the EC, and imports from it for 4 percent of the 
total imports.  After a sharp drop in 1990, two-way trade began to 
stabilize.  According to Racho Petrov, the Belgian side has shown an 
interest in Bulgaria's power engineering, electronics, equipment, 
chemicals and food processing industry.  The Belgian delegation 
tabled specific proposals for joint construction of small 
hydroelectric power stations, joint production and setting up of 
joint ventures.  According to Reneta Indzheva, executive director of 
the Privatization Agency, who also attended the meeting, Belgian 
capital will soon enter Bulgaria.  The first privatized company in 
Bulgaria, the Tsaramil animal feed plant in Razgrad, was sold to a 
Belgian buyer.  Belgian businessmen are interested in other large 
companies in this country, Indzheva said.  Belgian businessmen 
accompanying the delegation met officials of the Union for Private 
Economic Enterprise, the Bulgarian Chamber of Commerce and Industry, 
and the Bulgarian Industrial Association to discuss ways to promote 
Belgian investment in this country.  (Sofia BTA in English 1201 GMT 
25 Feb 94 AU) 

   ORTHODOX BANK TO RAISE CAPITAL:  The International Orthodox Bank, 
incorporated on the initiative of a group of Bulgarian citizens, is 
launching a capital-raising effort.  The Russian Patriarchate is 
ready to invest 150 million leva, the Greek Exarchate and the 
Serbian Patriarchate 50 million leva each, the Armenian Apostolic 
Orthodox Church in Bulgaria 10 million leva, Bulgarian commercial 
partnerships of various economic groups some 150 million leva, and 
the metropolitans of the Bulgarian Orthodox Church for Europe and 
the U.S. some 50 million leva, according to Vasil Gyatsov, secretary 
member of the Supreme Ecclesiastical Board of the Holy Synod.  He 
said that the Bulgarian Orthodox Church still does not fornially 
participate in the bank.  (Sofia BTA in English 1927 GMT 25 Feb 94 
AU) 

   IMF OFFICIAL EXPECTS AID GRANT IN 1994:  Bulgaria will receive an 
aggregate U.S.$500 million from the IMF in 1994 and 1995 after 
signing a stand-by arrangement, according to IMF resident 
representative Gregory Dahl.  To qualify for the SBA, Bulgaria must 
have its 1994 national budget passed by Parliament within the 
parameters agreed with the Fund.  Dahl believes that the 30 percent 
inflation, zero decline of the GDP and a budget deficit of 6.2 
percent of GDP, listed in the government's Letter of Intent to the 
IMF, are realistic if the government is able to keep within the 
budget and not resort to extra borrowing.  The big problem is to 
cope with the problems of the state-owned enterprises, for whose 
debts new loans are contracted, Dahl believes.  In his view, the 
results will depend on the government's efforts.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1739 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   CEMENT MAKER PREPARES FOR PRIVATIZATION:  The state-owned 
Beloizvorski Cement Works in Vratsa is preparing for privatization. 
It is one of the 13 large enterprises whose sale is to be arranged 
by the Privatization Agency.  The works' fixed tangible assets are 
appraised at 837 million leva.  Its 100 million leva of debts have 
been settled by the state and will be no burden for the buyer.  In 
addition, the cement mills in Devnya and Zlatna Panega are also up 
for sale.  They are priced at 734 million and 440 million leva 
respectively, but buyers are interested mainly in the Vratsa 
facility.  Compared with other cement producers, the enterprise has 
more efficient manufacturing lines and thus requires half the usual 
amount of fuel.  The company's capacity, however, is now 
underutilized owing to a smaller cement market.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1654 GMT 27 Feb 94 AU) 

   SHARP INCREASE IN FOREIGN CURRENCY DEPOSITS:  On 28 January 
STANDART NEWS reported that foreign exchange deposits in the 
Bulgarian banking system had increased by the equivalent of 2 
billion leva within the space of a week.  According to the latest 
figures released by the Bulgarian National Bank's Economic Analysis 
Department, state-owned enterprises keep the equivalent of 34.1 
billion leva in foreign currency deposit accounts, while private 
businessmen hold the equivalent of 8.5 billion leva.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1257 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   RETAIL PRICES RISE IN FEBRUARY:  Retail prices of goods monitored 
by the Council of Ministers went up by an average of 2.16 percent 
between 15 and 28 February, according to figures supplied by the 
National Statistical Institute.  The price of beef rose most (5.13 
percent), followed by white brined cow's cheese (4.62 percent), and 
cow's yogurt (4.16 percent).  (Sofia BTA in English 1956 GMT 28 Feb 
94 AU) 

   STRICTER CONDITIONS FOR HOUSING LOANS:  Amendments to the housing 
loans system that will come into force in the summer will introduce 
higher requirements for borrowers.  Specialists expect the new 
requirements to bring down the number of Bulgarians entitled to 
housing loans.  Under the regulations of the State Savings Bank 
(DSK), which has the major share in the housing loans system, the 
loan extended should be under 70 percent of the dwelling's market 
price.  The interest rate charged on housing loans is 56 percent for 
citizens with housing accounts and 61 per cent for those without 
such accounts.  The total numbers of housing accounts fell in recent 
years.  In late 1993 the housing accounts contained deposits of 
1.921 billion leva, compared with 2.484 billion in late 1992. 
According to DSK figures, 450,000 Bulgarians hold housing accounts 
at the moment, whereas in 1985 there were 560,000.  A 100,000 leva 
loan, for example, is repayable in 4,000 leva (about U.S.$100) 
monthly installments, which is too much for Bulgarians, according to 
DSK Deputy Chairman Georgi Tomov.  The minimum monthly pay is now 
1,565 leva (about U.S.$40).  According to Tomov, real estate is sold 
at speculative prices. 

   Vis-a-vis the percentage of owner-occupied dwellings, Bulgaria 
ranks first among the former socialist countries.  However, the 
statistical data refer to the number of dwellings and not the per 
capita floor area norm and one will often find families of different 
generations sharing one flat.  In 1958 the numerous construction 
companies were nationalized and transformed into large state-owned 
companies specialized in the construction of tall apartment blocks, 
the major type of town dwelling.  The flats constructed were owned 
by the municipalities and could be bought by the people living in 
them.  By 1989 the DSK was the only institution authorized to extend 
loans for house purchase and many Bulgarians had the chance to buy 
their own house on favorable terms without substantially affecting 
the family budget.  Having their own house is an obsession shared by 
nearly all Bulgarians. 

   According to the National Statistics Institute, 13,480 state- 
owned dwellings were constructed in 1992, compared with 30,050 in 
1985.  The increasing number of private construction companies 
during the past couple of years could not stop the downward trend in 
private house-building, which fell from 34,820 in 1985 to 4,100 in 
1992.  (Sofia BTA in English 1036 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNDERFUNDING IMPEDES SPRING SOWING:  The spring sowing is 
expected to put 1.3 million hectares under crops, Polina Stefanova, 
head of the Crop Farming Department at the Agriculture Ministry, 
announced today.  Some 600,000 hectares are expected to be planted 
with cereals, 450,000 hectares with industrial crops, 120,000 
hectares with animal feed crops, 70,000 hectares with vegetables, 
and 30,000 hectares with legumes.  The main problem is lack of funds 
for sowing.  Although the 1994 national budget allocates 1 billion 
leva for financing autumn and spring farm work in the 1993-94 
season, in practice this money is unlikely to reach farmers.  "The 
Ministry of Agriculture is not in a position to provide these funds, 
even though it has done everything within its powers," Agriculture 
Minister Georgi Tanev said.  Of the areas intended for sowing, 
800,000 hectares, or 60 percent, have been deep-plowed.  Between 60 
and 75 percent of the soil cultivators are ready for the planting 
season.  This year some 70 private companies will join the effort. 
All necessary quantities of pest-control chemicals are ready, as 
well as sufficient quantities of fertilizer.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1358 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   DOLLAR RATE EXCEEDS 40 LEVA, AT ALL TIME HIGH:  "Dollar Jumps 
Over 40 Leva.  Lev in Collapse," runs the headline of a front-page 
report in PARI on 2 March, commenting on the strengthening of the 
dollar in Bulgaria's foreign exchange market.  "The dollar's record- 
high of 40.20 leva crushed the Bulgarian national currency in the 
interbank market yesterday.  It was a new all-time low for the lev", 
PARI notes.  The daily cites Finance Minister Stoyan Aleksandrov as 
saying that "there is nothing to worry about if one dollar exchanges 
for 50 leva and the base interest rate goes down to 30 percent (now 
it is over 50 percent) because there are other compensatory 
factors."  "Dollar Hits 40.50 Leva, BNB (Bulgarian National Bank) 
Does Not Intervene," TRUD observes in a front-page headline.  The 
DEMOKRATSIYA daily notes that yesterday the banks purchased 
U.S.$11.2 million at an average exchange rate of 38.316 leva and 
sold $7.7 million at an average of 38.496 leva to the dollar. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1115 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT TO SUBSIDIZE TOBACCO INDUSTRY:  The purchasing of the 
65 percent of last year's tobacco harvest, which is still in 
warehouses, will be financed with a subsidy from the 1994 national 
budget, according to Agriculture Ministry Plant-Growing Department 
Chief Polina Stefanova.  The 1994 budget passed by parliament a 
couple of days ago allocates a total of 500 million leva in 
subsidies to be spent on purchasing for the 1993 tobacco harvest. 
According to  Stefanova, the subsidy will be enough to buy out the 
1993 harvest.  Bulgartabak Executive Director Rafail Ivanov said for 
his part that the subsidy will be spent to compensate the margin 
between the purchase and the market price of tobacco.  He also said 
that the distribution of the funds has yet to be considered.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1345 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   RETAIL PRICES RISE SLIGHTLY:  Retail prices of government 
monitored and controlled goods went up 0.68 percent over the past 
two weeks, the National Statistical Institute reported on 16 
February.  The greatest rise was registered in the price of milk -- 
2.41 percent, and cheese -- 3.43 per cent.  The prices of mutton, 
pork, and bread went down.  (Sofia BTA in English 2150 GMT 16 Feb 94 
AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK OFFICIAL VIEWS BANKING REFORM:  In an interview 
published in KONTINENT on 16 February, Mileti Mladenov, deputy 
governor of the Bulgarian National Bank (BNB), says that the plan to 
reform banking by building a two-tier banking system with a central 
bank independent of the government has not been achieved.  There are 
cases of the government and parliament putting pressure on the BNB 
as a result of the uneven progress of reforms and limited external 
financing.  The BNB's autonomy eliminates the possibility of 
financing the government automatically and unrestrictedly, but now 
most of the central bank's loans go to the government and much less 
to the country's economy, Mladenov points out. 

   The Bank Consolidation Company was set up to promote the 
regrouping of banks and their privatization.  As the legal framework 
is imperfect and because the banks to be privatized belong to the 
state, the BNB Board decided that decisions on selling the banks 
should be made by the government.  The delay in privatization makes 
the condition of the state banks even worse, and improvement can 
only be expected from the application of the Bad Debts Act and 
recapitalizing the banks through sales of shares and state property 
or making new issues of shares in the state banks.  Mladenov 
considers that part of the banking sector should remain under the 
control of the state.  (Sofia BTA in English 1234 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   KHASKOVO TOBACCO PLANT RESUMES PRODUCTION:  The Trakiya Tobacco 
Plant in Khaskovo has resumed production and will be operating at 
peak capacity within 15 days.  Until recently its warehouse was 
packed full of cigarettes.  Now Trakiya is about to make a comeback 
after closing a profitable deal with Russia.  Bulgarski Turgovski 
Dom, a Plovdiv-based private company with a branch in Moscow, will 
export to Russia about 1,500 tons of cigarettes in 1994.  Trakiya 
began exporting cigarettes to the Soviet Union in 1967, and its 
highest annual exports to date were 20,000 tons.  The latest deal 
will provide security for the hard-pressed plant and its 1,700 
employees and will also enable the plant to pay money due to 17,000 
tobacco growers for the purchase of last year's crop.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1634 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   PLAMA REFINERY'S DIFFICULTIES REPORTED:  Production has stopped 
at the Plama Oil Refinery in Pleven.  Plama president Nikola 
Pukalski explained that there was nowhere to store the lubricating 
oils the plant produced.  In November and December it produced 
16,700 tons of lubricating oils which were supposed to be exported 
to Ukraine under a bilateral agreement.  Part of the money due has 
not been paid.  Production will probably be resumed in mid-March. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1738 GMT 20 Feb 94 AU) 

   COST OF LOANS FALLS IN FEBRUARY:  The cost of loans to the 
economic sector went down in the first two weeks of February, 24 
CHASA reports on 21 February, citing figures from the Bulgarian 
National Bank.  The interest charged on long-term loans was reduced 
significantly from an annual 93.35 percent in late January to 82.90 
percent on February 11, representing a monthly interest rate of 5.16 
percent.  The interest rate on short-term loans dropped from 88.65 
to 88.43 per cent, or 5.42 percent per month.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1105 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   AUSTRIAN BANK SEEKS TO OPERATE IN BULGARIA:  Raiffeisen 
Zentralbank of Austria has asked the Bulgarian National Bank (BNB) 
for permission to establish a bank in Bulgaria, STANDART NEWS 
reported on 21 February.  The BNB chiefs declined to specify whether 
Raiffeisen Bank proposed to found a new bank or to buy the Bank for 
Agricultural Credit, in which it currently holds a 34 percent stake. 
According to experts, Raiffeisen Bank is more likely to go for the 
second option.  The Bank for Agricultural Credit is one of the most 
stable financial institutions in this country and is among the few 
to post a handsome profit for 1993.  (Sofia BTA in English 1105 GMT 
21 Feb 94 AU) 

   PRODUCTION, CONSUMPTION OF DAIRY PRODUCTS FALLS:  Deputy 
Agriculture Minister Yuri Borisov reported a considerable drop in 
the production of milk and dairy products to a meeting of top 
Agriculture Ministry officials.  The major causes are a drastic cut 
in the number of livestock and poor technological conditions at 
breeding farms.  Other causes are low purchase prices and irregular 
payments to suppliers.  In 1993 milk output dropped by 337.7 million 
liters from 1992.  Production of staple dairy products also went 
down:  white brined cheese by 10,932 tons; yellow cheese, 2,048 
tons; and butter, 4,218 tons.  However, dairy products are plentiful 
on the domestic market, due to per capita consumption falling from 
194 liters in 1990 to 130 liters in 1993, and a rise in imports. 
The largest exporters of cheese to Bulgaria were Estonia, Lithuania, 
Denmark, and France. 

   Bulgarian cheese, until now one of the staple exports, hit a ten- 
year low of 10,200 tons in 1993, down from 26,877 tons in 1985. 
About 30 percent of it went to Greece; 45 percent to the United 
States, Macedonia, and Lebanon; and the rest to France, Germany, and 
Australia.  Practically none was exported to the former Soviet 
Union, which used to buy over 10,000 tons of cow's cheese per year. 
The Agriculture Ministry expects milk output to reach last year's 
level of 1,506.6 million liters and expects purchasing to increase 
12 percent.  The production of white brined cheese and yellow cheese 
is expected to rise by 6,700 tons and 2,000 tons respectively. 
According to the deputy agriculture minister, the government's 
efforts to guarantee purchase prices and low interest loans and to 
encourage stock breeding in mountain regions give grounds for 
optimism.  (Sofia BTA in English 1027 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   HOUSEHOLD BUDGETS ANALYZED:  Bulgarians spend 37 percent of their 
earnings on food, according to a household budget survey carried out 
by the National Statistical Institute and published in STANDART NEWS 
on 23 February.  Bread and pastry account for 13 percent of food 
consumption, followed by eggs, 12.8 percent; milk, 6.5 percent; and 
fresh vegetables, 5.8 percent.  Meat consumption dropped from 4.2 
percent in 1992 to 3.7 percent in 1993.   Cigarettes and alcohol 
account for 0.1 percent and 1.6 percent of household expenses 
respectively.  (Sofia BTA in English 1317 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   FIRST CELLULAR TELEPHONE NETWORK:  The first cellular radio 
telephone network in Bulgaria was officially launched in Sofia on 23 
February.  The system is called Mobifon.  It covers Sofia and its 
environs, and has over 1,000 subscribers.  The system will shortly 
be extended to Varna, Burgas, Plovdiv, and the highway from Sofia 
and Plovdiv.  Later it will cover all the larger towns.  Mobifon is 
the trademark of the Bulgarian-British Radiotelecommunications 
Company Ltd., in which Bulgaria holds a 51 percent stake.  (Sofia 
Khorizont Radio Network in Bulgarian 1400 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   CABINET APPROVES WAGE INDEXATION MECHANISM:  At its regular 
session on 3 February, the Council of Ministers adopted three 
decrees that determine the mechanism for its income indexing policy 
this year.  The three regulatory documents were approved in their 
final form after several months of discussions and consultations 
with the trade unions and employers within the National Council for 
Trilateral Cooperation. 

   The first decree sets a new national minimum wage of 1,565 leva 
per month for the first quarter of 1994 and raises the social 
pension received by about 2.5 million pensioners from 450 to 780 
leva per month.  The minimum income for persons receiving social 
assistance is set at 980 leva per month.  During the first quarter 
of 1994 other benefits and payments, such as unemployment benefitS 
and children's allowances, will be indexed by a coefficient of 1.107 
on the basis of the forecast inflation rate for the quarter, namely 
10.7 percent. 

   The second decree regulates wages and salaries in material 
production and the trading sector.  It provides that wages should 
now be indexed on the basis of the forecast inflation rate, as 
compared to last year, when wages were increased on a trailing basis 
by 85 percent of the actual inflation rate. 

   The third cabinet decree regulates the principles for fixing 
wages and salaries in state enterprises, government departments, and 
other organizations funded from the national budget.  Actual 
salaries will vary in different organizations and departments:  For 
example, the average gross monthly salary of employees of the 
Committee for Power Supply will be 5,942 leva; for health care 
employees, the average salary will be 3,685 leva; and for employees 
in the field of education, 3,200 leva.  (Sofia PARI in Bulgarian 4 
Feb 94 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   MACEDONIAN DELEGATION SEEKS BULGARIAN TOURISTS:  Last year 50,000 
Bulgarians went on vacation to Ohrid in Macedonia, Ohrid Mayor 
Blagoje Siljanoski told a news conference on 9 February. 
Siljanovski and about a hundred Macedonian tourist executives, 
mostly from Ohrid, have arrived to attend the Holiday '94 
International Tourist Fair, which will open on 10 February in Sofia. 
This year Macedonia hopes to attract as many tourists as in 1990, 
when over 1 million visited that country, spending 3.5 million 
overnights there, Dose Kotevski, deputy chairman of the Chamber of 
Economy of Macedonia said.  He added that they will rely heavily on 
Bulgarian vacationers in reaching this goal. 

   The Macedonian delegation, which includes directors of the 
largest Macedonian hotels and travel agencies as well as the head of 
the Macedonian Press Office Zivko Georgievski, met with Bulgarian 
intellectuals.  The guests will meet central and local government 
officials in Plovdiv and Stara Zagora. 

   Tourist exchanges between Bulgaria and Macedonia are hindered by 
the limited traffic capacity of the three border checkpoints, the 
bad roads, and the lack of a direct rail link between Skopje and 
Sofia.  A working team from the two countries' ministries in charge 
of the border checkpoints discussed at their first meeting on 8 
February a project to extend the Bulgarian checkpoint at Gyueshevo, 
it was announced at the press conference.  For two years now the 
transport ministers of the two countries have been discussing the 
construction of a 40-km stretch of railway across the border to 
provide a direct rail link between Bulgaria and Macedonia, but the 
route has yet to be finalized. 

   hrid is the largest tourist center of the Republic of Macedonia. 
It lay within the boundaries of the Bulgarian state during various 
periods prior to the Ottoman conquest.  (Sofia BTA in English 1509 
GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 

   MINISTRY OF TRADE'S PRIVATIZATION EFFORTS:  In 1993 the Ministry 
of Trade conducted 32 privatization transactions, producing receipts 
totalling 188 million leva, Valentin Karabashev, deputy prime 
minister and minister of trade, told a news conference held on 9 
February to mark the first anniversary of the start of 
privatization.  The privatized enterprises are mainly garages, 
warehouses, and shops, plus a single foreign trade company. 
Karabashev pointed out that the Privatization Agency and other 
institutions have joined in the process, but only the Ministry of 
Trade has carried out its privatization program in full.  "To my 
great regret, the other authorized institutions are falling behind," 
he observed. 

   Last year the Ministry of Trade privatized seven enterprises more 
than planned and initiated a further 104 procedures, Karabashev 
stated.  He rejected press allegations that the enterprises were 
sold at knock-down prices.  "The selling prices exceed the 
privatization appraisals of the companies by an average of 28 
percent, and their fixed assets (totalling 41 million leva) by about 
four times," he said.  This year the Ministry of Trade plans to 
privatize 120 companies engaged in trade and services, after which 
50 percent of that sphere will become private property, and in 
another year or so the remaining 50 percent will be privatized as 
well, Karabashev said.  (Sofia BTA in English 1657 GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 

   STATE-CONTROLLED BANKS' LOSSES TOP $270 MILLION:  State- 
controlled Bulgarian banks made losses exceeding 10 billion leva 
(some $270 million) this financial year, TRUD reported on 10 
February, citing estimates from the profit and loss accounts of more 
than half of all banking institutions.  "The figures suggest that 
the banks' state of finances has not been worse since they were 
established," experts are quoted by the daily as saying.  Only 10 
percent of Bulgaria's banks are expected to be in the black.  TRUD 
observes that even some of the profit-makers, which were 
consolidated into new merger groups at the end of last year, will 
move into the red because of the huge losses of the other 
constituent banks in their groups.  The disastrous annual financial 
performance is due mainly to the accrual of nonperforming loans, 
which entails even larger losses because of the steep interest 
rates, TRUD noted.  As a result of this, banks will probably be 
unable to pay dividends to their shareholders.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1219 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   THERMOELECTRIC PLANT CUTS PRODUCTION:  The Ruse-East 
Thermoelectric Power Plant is at present operating at 30 percent of 
its design capacity as a result of a fall in demand in the region. 
It is producing 90 instead of the usual 260 megawatts and trying to 
run down its coal stocks.  The plant has diverted a shipment of 
6,000 tons of Ukrainian coal to the power plant in Vidin.  Since the 
start of the year, the plant has not supplied any industrial steam 
to the factories in the town's eastern industrial zone because they 
are barely functioning and owe a total of 120 million leva to the 
power station.  Due to the low level of electricity production, the 
plant itself is finding it difficult to repay the 150 million leva 
of credits it has been granted.  (Sofia PARI in Bulgarian 10 Feb 94 
p 3 AU) 

   RUSSIAN ENVOY BLAMES GOVERNMENTS FOR TRADE DECLINE:  Addressing 
the press on 10 February following a meeting with the president of 
the Bulgarian Economic Association Bozhidar Danov, Russian 
Ambassador Aleksandr Avdeyev ascribed the lion's share of blame for 
the decline of trade between Bulgaria and Russia to the governments, 
which did not provide the legal basis for trade.  The high excise 
and customs duties make Bulgarian goods hard to sell in Russia, he 
said.  According to Avdeyev, the establishment of joint ventures and 
payments through commercial banks can help promote trade.  Russian 
business circles show interest in privatization of tourist 
facilities on the Black Sea and some industrial companies, the 
ambassador said.  (Sofia BTA in English 2249 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   FIGURES ON FOREIGN LOANS PUBLISHED:  Bulgaria has received a 
total of $2,200 million in loans from world financial institutions 
since the fall of the communist regime on November 10, 1989, DUMA, 
STANDART NEWS, and 24 CHASA reported on 11 February, citing a report 
by the Finance Ministry to the Parliamentary Budget and Finance 
Committee.  Bulgaria received $644 million from the IMF, of which 
$474 million was under the first stand-by agreement and $170 million 
under the second.  The World Bank extended Bulgaria $445 million in 
credits, credits for $161 million have been agreed on with the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development, and the European 
Investment Bank has extended Bulgaria credits totalling $316 
million.  (Sofia BTA in English 1148 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   CIGARETTE EXPORTS TO RUSSIA:  The Tobacco Combined Works in 
Khaskovo signed a contract to export 15,000 tons of cigarettes worth 
$56 million to Russia, 24 CHASA reported on 11 February, citing the 
director of the works, Nikolay Zakhariev.  The contract will be 
implemented by Bulgartabak.  (Sofia BTA in English 1148 GMT 11 Feb 
94 AU) 

   FISH CANNING FACTORY EXPORTS OUTPUT:  The Slavyanka Fish Cannery 
in Burgas -- the only one in Bulgaria -- produces 10 tons of canned 
fish per day.  After a prolonged forced outage it has just resumed 
production.  Most of the plant's products are exported to Greece. 
The fish is canned according to Greek recipes and has not so far 
appeared on the Bulgarian market.  (Sofia BTA in English 1808 GMT 13 
Feb 94 AU) 

   BULGARIAN-SERBIAN BUSINESS MEETING:  A Bulgarian-Serbian business 
meeting was held in Vidin on 10 February.  The meeting was hosted by 
the Vidin Chamber of Industry and Commerce and was attended by 15 
Serbian and 20 Bulgarian companies.  (Sofia BTA in English 1808 GMT 
13 Feb 94 AU) 

   GROUP FORMED TO PROTECT VARNA CONSTRUCTION MARKET:  Sixteen 
construction companies in Varna have set up a construction chamber. 
Its purpose is to consolidate the construction market and preserve 
it for local companies.  Though almost 300 construction companies 
have been registered, the number of such companies actually working 
in the construction market is actually 10 times smaller, according 
to the chamber's chairman Krasimir Daskalov.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1808 GMT 13 Feb 94 AU) 

   BRAZILIAN SUGAR:  The Martsianopulos Factory in Devnya has 
started processing 18,000 tons of raw sugar from Brazil for the 
domestic market.  According to the plant's director Boris Terziev, 
the recent rise in the sugar price was caused by the adverse trading 
situation on world exchanges, the rise of the U.S. dollar against 
the lev, inflation, and the fact that this country's raw material 
basis has been almost destroyed.  (Sofia BTA in English 1808 GMT 13 
Feb 94 AU) 

   GABON GRANTS TIMBER CONCESSION:  The Government of Gabon has 
granted Bulgaria a concession for lumbering and trade in timber, 
according to a statement from Ginyo Ganev, legal adviser and member 
of a Bulgarian delegation back from Gabon.  The concession was 
granted to Balkanbank, which will select financial and business 
partners.  Balkanbank will explore 223,000 hectares of tropical 
forest and negotiate the term of the concession, set between 25 and 
30 years in preliminary talks.  President Omar Bongo received 
members of the Bulgarian delegation.  Gabon's foreign minister 
expressed a desire for broader cooperation with Bulgaria, Ganev 
said.  (Sofia BTA in English 2044 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN POSTAL RATES SOUGHT:  On 15 February the National 
Council for Tripartite Cooperation decided to submit to the 
government the softer of the two projects proposed by the Post and 
Telecommunications Committee (PTC) for increasing internal and 
international postal, telegraph, telephone, radio, TV and telematic 
services charges.  According to the project, most postal charges 
will rise by 75 to 300 percent, while some rises will be even 
steeper.  The charges collected at present are insufficient to cover 
the postal system's actual expenses, whose losses exceed the state 
subsidies of 165 million leva (about $4.5 million), the PTC claims. 
The project envisages some concessions for individuals and higher 
charges for companies and organizations. 

   The decision for submitting the project to the Council of 
Ministers was not adopted by consensus.  The main objection raised 
by the social partners who disagreed with the project is that the 
self-financing potential of the system's infrastructure of post 
offices and the Bulgarian Post Bank is not used adequately.  The 
preferences given to the Defense Ministry and the Ministry of the 
Interior also caused discontent.  The government's representative on 
the council,  Mr. Bankov, denied that the new postal charges had 
been calculated without considering the actual incomes of the 
population.  The increased charges takes into account the inflation 
rate projected for this year (45 percent) on which the amount of 
some social benefits is based, Bankov pointed out.  According to 
him, the increase will probably be introduced as of March 1.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1757 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   GREEK BUSINESSMEN SEEK NEW CONTACTS:  An international conference 
on Bulgaria's prospects in United Europe was held in the Boyana 
Residence in Sofia on 15 February by the Union of Greek Businessmen 
in Bulgaria and attended by state officials, bankers, and Bulgarian 
and Greek businessmen.  Greek businessmen have made considerable 
efforts to build up their businesses in Bulgaria but we have not yet 
utilized all opportunities, said Panayotis Piroyanos, the unions' 
chairman.  According to Deputy Minister of Trade Velev, 1993 set a 
record in Bulgarian-Greek trade relations.  Bilateral trade reached 
$400 million.  About 400 Bulgarian-Greek joint ventures are 
operating in Bulgaria.  Four Greek banks have opened offices here 
and the joint Bulgarian-Greek bank has been granted a full-service 
license.  Mileti Mladenov, deputy governor of the Bulgarian National 
Bank (BNB) told the conference about the reform in Bulgaria's 
banking system.  (Sofia BTA in English 0906 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH REPUBLIC 

   JAPANESE, GERMANS GAIN STAKE IN TESLA HRADEC KRALOVE:  In March, 
the first general meeting of the Tesla Hradec Kralove company will 
take place.  The company was established with the Japanese company 
Y.S. (manufacturer of ceramics), JAIDO, a Japanese fund to support 
exports, and the Czech-American Entrepreneurial Fund.  Tesla owns 97 
percent of this new company.  At the first general meeting, it will 
be decided that the basic capital will be increased to 163 million 
Czech Korunas (Kc): Y.S. will gain 20 percent, and the two financial 
institutions will gain under 20 percent each.  Tesla Hradec Kralove 
will sign an agreement with the German firm Possehl Elektronik on 
establishing a joint venture company with basic capital of Kc16 
million.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 22 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   KLAUS IN MUNICH TO MEET REPRESENTATIVES OF GERMAN FIRMS:  Czech 
Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus arrived in Munich on 23 February for a 
two-day private visit at the invitation of the Allianz Insurance 
Company, the biggest of its kind in Europe, and the BMW automobile 
company.   Klaus is to attend a meeting of representatives of 
leading German companies, banks and societies, including Bayer, 
BASF, Siemens, Hoechst, Bertelsmann, Grundig, Thyssen and Krupp. 
The meeting will also be attended by Hans Peter Stihl, Chairman of 
the Association of German Chambers of Industry and Commerce (DIHT), 
Otto Wolff von Amerongen, chairman of the German Economy Eastern 
Committee, and former German President Walter Scheel.   Klaus is to 
visit the BMW base and meet with its managing board. He is 
accompanied by Czech Economic Minister Karel Dyba, who is to meet 
with his Bavarian counterpart Otto Wiesheu.  They are expected to 
discuss possible extension of Czech-Bavarian Economic cooperation. 
(Prague CTK in English 2101 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   PRODUCTION FELL, RETAIL SALES INCREASED IN 1993:  The Czech 
Republic's industrial production fell last year by 5.3 percent (in 
constant prices) and construction production by 7.5 percent, while 
retail sales increased by 1 percent, according to preliminary data 
from the Czech Statistical Office (CSU).  Production was worth 
Kc93O.73 billion (about $31 billion) in current prices last year and 
Kc444.62 billion (over $14 billion) in constant prices.  Exports 
(without Slovakia) increased one-fifth last year to Kc297.67 billion 
and imports 2.7 percent to Kc3O1.34 billion.  Exports from Slovakia 
were Kc74.63 billion and imports from there Kc65.02 billion.  The 
Czech Republic had a trade surplus with Slovakia (Kc9.61 billion) 
but a trade deficit with other countries (Kc3.67 billion).  The 
average monthly wage in organizations with 25 or more workers 
increased between December 1992 and December 1993 by 18.6 percent to 
Kc6,665 in industry, by 24.6 percent to Kc7,579 in construction, by 
14.9 percent to Kc5,447 in retail, and by 17.4 percent to Kc6,396 
crowns in transportation.  The number of unemployed increased 
between January 1993 and the same month of 1994 from 158,113 to 
198,837 persons, which represents an increase in the unemployment 
rate from 3.0 to 3.8 percent.  (Prague CTK in English 1944 GMT 23 
Feb 94 AU) 

   COUNTERFEIT GERMAN MARKS SEIZED IN MORAVIA:  A total of 414,000 
German marks worth of forged German banknotes seized in an apartment 
here on Tuesday, 22 February, is probably the largest stash of 
forgeries found in central Europe in the last 10 years, Petr Dvorak 
of the Central Criminal Police said today.  The find of forged notes 
is the largest in Czech history.  In August 1993 a stash of 998 
forged 100-German-mark bills was fotind in the Moravian town of Nove 
Mesto.  The apartment had been rented to a 50-year-old Italian man, 
who was arrested on Monday, 21 February, in Cesky Tesin on the 
Polish border.  The suspect, M.C., was sentenced in absentia in Rome 
last year to 19 years in prison and a 180-million-lira ($107,000) 
fine for cocaine smuggling.  There had been an international warrant 
out for his arrest.  Dvorak said M.C. had admitted intending to use 
the 4,410 forged 100-mark bills to buy precious stones in Russia. 
(Prague CTK in English 1657 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH NATIONALS IN MORAVIA SET UP BUSINESS CONFEDERATION:  The 
main focus of the activities of the confederation of Polish 
entrepreneurs in the Czech Republic is to contribute to the 
development of new commercial and production activities, 
particularly in north Moravia and Silesia.  The confederation began 
operating this month in Cesky Tesin, near the Polish border, and 35 
small and medium-sized businesses have become its members so far. 
Most of the owners are Polish nationals living in the Czech 
Republic, while four of the firms are located in Polish border 
cities.  Confederation President Bronislav Batorek expects 
membership to increase to 300, and possibly include partners from 
other areas in the Czech Republic.  Confederation members will 
cooperate with businesses in Poland, Austria, Slovenia, and also 
with firms located in the Commonwealth of the Independent States 
(CIS).  Confederation activity will include providing up-to-date 
information on production possibilities and arranging joint 
production projects.  (Prague CTK in English 1210 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECHS, SLOVAKS RESUME ARMS SALES:  The Czech and Slovak 
Republics are silently setting their arms industries on their feet, 
the British paper DAILY TELEGRAPH writes on 28 February.  The two 
countries say that it was economic reasons that led them to resume 
arms production that is not so extensive but more competitive, the 
daily states.  In 1990, after halting arms production and exports, 
the unemployment rate in the towns of Martin and Dubnica, both 
central Slovakia, which had relied exclusively on the arms industry, 
reached 25 per cent.  The Czech Republic has established a research, 
development, and production group uniting twelve arms producers and 
aimed at promoting arms exports.  The Slovak Government has created 
the Armex consortium to coordinate production and sales of arms 
systems, the paper reports.  It quotes Slovak representatives as 
saying they intended to increase arms production to 30 to 40 percent 
of its volume in the cold war period.  (Prague CTK in English 1139 
GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN CAPITAL MADE UP 30 PERCENT OF MONEY SUPPLY IN 1993:  The 
influx of foreign capital made up one third of the money supply in 
1993, according to an estimate made by the Ceska Narodni Banka 
(Czech National Bank).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 24 Feb 
94 p 1 AU) 

   EXPORTS INCREASED MORE THAN IMPORTS IN 1993:  Exports from the 
Czech Republic rose by 20 percent against 1992, while imports rose 
only by 2.7 percent.  The most pronounced increase in exports was 
into countries with advanced market economy, particularly into 
Germany, Britain, and Austria.  This is what ensues from the report 
of the Ministry of Industry and Trade.  Exports reached $12.8 
billion, and imports $12.5 billion.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Czech 24 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   ADAMOVSKE STROJIRNY MAKE KC91 MILLION PROFIT:  The audit made by 
Ernst &amp; Young Consulting confirms that Adamovske Strojirny 
(Adamovske Engineering Plants) in Adamov made a profit of Kc91 
million.  This is why the management will propose at the general 
meeting that dividends be paid out.  The production of goods 
exceeded Kc1.3 billion, of which one fifth were pumps and pump 
appliances, and more than thee fifths were printing machines. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 24 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   SURVEY FINDS MOST REFORM SUPPORT IN CZECH REPUBLIC, ALBANIA:  In 
a survey of 16 Central and Eastern European countries conducted by 
the Commission of the European Union and published today, the Czech 
Republic emerges as the country with most popular support for the 
tempo of its reforms.  In terms of overall satisfaction with a 
market economy, however, 71 percent of Albanian citizens expressed 
their approval, the highest result in the survey.  With the growth 
of the economy in that country the financial situation of Albanian 
households has also been improving.  Czechs were somewhat more 
restrained in their praise of capitalist economies, with 51 percent 
signifying approval and 36 percent disapproval.  In Slovakia the 
majority in the survey were displeased with market economy (44 
percent disapproval, 40 percent approval).  The market economy was 
rejected by an absolute majority of polled citizens from the 
Commonwealth of the Independent States, but overall the survey found 
that its support was eroding in other countries as well. 

   Survey results link the current economic difficulties in the 
countries with the drop off in support.  A total of 50 percent of 
Czech Republic's citizens approved of the pace of reform, the most 
of all countries surveyed.  Twenty-one percent considered the reform 
process to be too slow and 18 percent too quick.  In all other 
countries the dominant opinion was that reform was proceeding too 
slowly.  Citizens of the Czech Republic also approved of the pace of 
privatization -- 39 percent considered the pace to be optimal.  It 
was too slow for 36 percent and too fast for 14 percent of Czech 
citizens.  In Poland and Macedonia, however, a majority of citizens 
considered the progress of privatization to be too quick, while in 
other countries a majority saw privatization as proceeding too 
slowly.  The greatest dissatisfaction with the tempo of 
privatization was observed in Slovakia where 54 percent said it was 
too slow, and in Ukraine where 59 percent were dissatisfied with the 
pace of privatization.  (Prague CTK in English 2141 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   SEVENTY-ONE MILLION FOREIGNERS VISITORS IN 1993:  In 1993, 71.1 
million foreign visitors visited the Czech Republic, which is 3.3 
percent more than in 1992.  11.5 million were tourists, mostly from 
Germany, Holland, Italy, Austria, and Poland.  According to the 
Ceska Narodni Banka (Czech National Bank) estimate, the yield from 
tourism will amount to $1.4 billion, which is roughly 24 percent 
more than in 1992.  Foreign currency income from tourism makes up 
approximately 11 percent of Czech exports and 4 percent of gross 
domestic product.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 11 Feb 94 p 3 
AU) 

   CESKE ENERGETICKE ZAVODY READYING NEW BOND ISSUE:  Ceske 
Energeticke Zavody (Czech Electrical Plants) (CEZ) wants to cover 
its capital costs by issuing bonds worth 10 to 11 billion Czech 
korunas (Kc).  In January, CEZ issued bonds worth Kc4 billion.  CEZ 
IS preparING an emission that should be placed at the London 
exchange.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY, BURZOVNI NOVINY Supplement 14 
Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   U.S. FIRM TO TREAT RADIOACTIVE WASTE WATER:  The U.S. firm Ionics 
Inc. has signed a contract with a Czech state-owned firm to deliver 
$40.2 million worth of technology for purifying radioactive waste 
water.  The contract was signed with the state enterprise Diamo, the 
successor to Czechoslovak Uranium Mines.  A spokesman for the 
Massachusetts-based Ionics said the treatment system would operate 
for two years to clean the water in a large underground reservoir 
where a quantity of sulphuric acid has formed, and which contains 
other poisonous substances and endangers the drinking water supply. 
The spokesman said the process has been so perfected that the 
treated water is clean enough to be returned to rivers, and the 
crystallized impurities are of high enough quality to be used in 
industry.  The firm previously used the technology to clean uranium 
mine water poisoning the Vistula River in Poland.  The Diamo 
contract is the largest in Ionics' history.  (Prague CTK in English 
0810 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   JEZEK ON SECOND COUPON PRIVATIZATION WAVE:  In the second wave of 
coupon privatization more information on enterprises will be 
provided than in the first wave, Tomas Jezek, National Property Fund 
(FNM) chairman, said on Czech Television on 16 February.  One of the 
reasons is the fact that the structure of enterprises entering the 
second wave is more complex, Jezek said.  The second wave comprises 
the enterprises designated for the second-wave of privatization, 
plus enterprises that were not privatized in the first wave, he 
explained, adding that this does not mean they are of lower quality. 
On the contrary, he said that enterprises or their parts not sold 
during the first wave are sometimes of high quality, and, despite 
high demand, have not been sold because of pure technicalities. 
Jezek confirmed that the first round of the second wave should start 
at the beginning of April.  (Prague CTK in English 1418 GMT 16 Feb 
94 AU) 

   STATE WILL FINANCE WATERWAYS:  The government considers public 
transportation via waterways to be a classic case of a useful state 
service, Czech Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus said today after a 
cabinet meeting.  The government even intends to finance such 
transport from the state budget.  For this objective, Kc125 million 
(about $4.1 million) have been provided from this year's state 
budget, he added.  (Prague CTK in English 2255 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH INSURANCE BANK TO LAUNCH PENSION FUND:  The Czech Insurance 
Bank, a joint stock company, is to launch a pension fund that will 
function as an independent joint stock venture, bank spokesman 
Zbysek Stepanek told CTK today.  The bank's decision is a reaction 
to the passing by parliament of a law on pension premiums with state 
participation.  With its current 13 different old age pension 
schemes, the bank has ample experience to draw on, Stepanek said. 
The law requires that 85 percent of the fund's net gains be used 
directly for the benefit of individual contributors, something that 
has been the bank's policy "ever since," Stepanek said, adding that 
profit from the fund's investment policy allows the bank to make 
increased payments each year to offset the effect of inflation 
besides delivering the premiums.  The bank has had a policy of 
paying out an even higher proportion of the gains to the 
contributors than required under the law, Stepanek said.  The law on 
pension premiums allows individual contributors to the schemes to 
obtain payments on top of standard old age pensions.  (Prague CTK in 
English 1504 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   ASSOCIATION OF ENTREPENEURS' POLITICAL AGENDA:  Entrepreneurs 
want more representation in town halls and in the senate.  The 
Association of Entrepreneurs of the Czech Republic (SP) is preparing 
its strategy for the community and senate elections this autumn, 
Chairman Rudolf Baranek told a press conference today.  The SP wants 
to cooperate with the parties of the governing coalition, the Party 
of Entrepreneurs, Farmers, and Tradespeople, the Liberal National 
Social Party (LSNS) and the newly formed initiative for uniting 
right-wing parties.  The problem was that entrepreneurs did not have 
time, SP representatives said.  A partial solution was to find 
pensioners with entrepreneurial ability to run as candidates. 
Baranek said that he was convinced that, as of next year, the tax 
rates on the income of individuals and companies would be under 40 
percent. 

   SP Adviser Jaroslav Vostatek said the government was considering 
making better connections between tax and insurance.  The prepared 
changes to the tax and insurance system are to be negotiated by the 
Tripartite Council for Economic and Social Agreement and put before 
parliament this year.  Among the SP's proposals, which it wants to 
consult with other employer's associations, is the introduction of a 
joint maximum assessment basis for insurance in all branches of 
social insurance for employers and entrepreneurs. 

   The SP also wants to increase the value of tax-deductible 
donations to 3 percent from the tax base, and to introduce a "super 
fast" write-off for material property that would be approximately 
1.3 times faster than the present accelerated write-off, and to 
extend the road tax outside the business sector.  They want income 
tax rates to be lowered for legal persons to a maximum of 37 
percent, and would like to see an ideal rate of 25-30 percent in 
five years' time.  The income tax scale for the income tax of 
physical persons should be made to rise less steeply, with the 
maximum rate being lowered to 38 percent, the association says. 

   The SP will also call for the payment of insurance by the 
employee and the employer to be merged.  The lower rate of value 
added tax should be raised to about 7 percent, with the basic rate 
being lowered.  In five to seven years both rates should be brought 
together at about 15 to 18 percent, they say, so that its total 
weight in the state revenues is not lowered. Deputy Finance Minister 
Jan Klak said recently that lower tax rates for company incomes to 
39 or 38 percent and for individuals to 42 or 41 percent would start 
at the beginning of 1996.  At present, they are 42 and 44 per cent 
respectively.  (Prague CTK in English 1926 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH OFFICIAL VIEWS REGIONAL COOPERATION:  Overcoming the 
recession must be the main objective in the densely-populated areas 
next to the Czech-Polish border, Katowice Regional Administrator 
Wojciech Czech told journalists on 17 February.  Czech is on a 
working visit to the Czech Republic.  Poland currently has 20 non- 
governmental organizations committed to regional cooperation with 
Czech and Slovak business and cultural bodies, Czech said.  A 
meeting of bilateral regional representatives to be held on March 2- 
3 may spur more cooperation, he said, adding that there are plans 
for a commodities exchange to be run jointly by Poland, the Czech 
Republic, and Slovakia, and for an agency -- to be also run jointly 
by the three countries -- to coordinate economic, cultural and 
tourist industry policies. 

   Cooperation may extend to banking, insurance, and consultation, 
Czech said, adding that it might even lead to making the Odra River 
navigable as far as Ostrava, north Moravia; a prerequisite for 
constructing the Odra-Danube and Odra-Vistula canals.  These 
waterways would help solve many difficulties in the transport, 
environment and energy sectors, Czech said.  (Prague CTK in English 
1929 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN FIRM SUPPLIES EXTRA GAS DURING COLD SPELL:  The German 
natural gas distributor Ruhrgas supplied 5 million cubic meters of 
gas per day to the Czech Republic on February 15 and 16 and 2 
million cubic meters on 17 February, Antonin Lomecky of the Czech 
Natural Gas Enterprise (CPP) told CTK today.  The supplementary 
supplies of natural gas were ordered because the recent cold spell 
has increased demand to a level that could not be satisfied by 
Russian natural gas supplies. 
   The Russian company Gazprom supplies the Czech Republic with 
almost 7 billion cubic meters of natural gas per year.  The daily 
power input of over 19 million cubic meters is stored in four 
underground storage tanks in Moravia with a total capacity of 1.8 
billion cubic meters.  There is also a storage tank rented from the 
Slovak firm Naf ta of Gbely, where 500 million cubic meters per year 
are stored, Lomecky said.  The daily rate of consumption of natural 
gas in the Czech Republic ranges from 6.5 million cubic meters 
during the summer season to 42.5 million in winter.  When 
temperatures are very low, the volume of gas from Russia is 
insufficient.  That is why a contract was signed with Ruhrgas for 
200 million cubic meters of natural gas to be delivered during the 
first quarter of this year, Lomecky said.  In addition to the 
contract with Ruhrgas, we have other agreements about supplementary 
gas supplies with gas companies in neighboring countries -- VMG of 
Leipzig, Wintershall, and the Slovak Natural Gas Industry 
enterprise, Lomecky explained.  (Prague CTK in English 1257 GMT 18 
Feb 94 AU) 

   ESTEE LAUDER TO PROVIDE SERVICES IN PRAGUE:  The prestigious U.S. 
firm Estee Lauder will its provide services to Prague residents.  On 
the basis of a contract with Prague City Hall, the company Is 
renting commercial space in Zelezna Street for 10 years.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   JAWA TO EXPORT MOTORCYCLES TO ARGENTINA:  Jawa Tynec nad Sazavou 
has concluded a contract for the delivery of 4,500 motorcycles to 
Argentina.  This includes the delivery of 1,500 Chopper-type 
motorcycles.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   JIHLAVA FIRM TO PRODUCE OPTICAL CONNECTORS:  The Optokon Jihlava 
company, in cooperation with the Japanese companies JDS Fitel and 
Seiko Instruments, will manufacture optical connectors.  This state- 
of-the-art technology is earmarked mainly for the digitalization of 
the Czech and Slovak telephone networks.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
18 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   'MARKED' INCREASE IN PRICES IN JANUARY:  The marked increase in 
prices in January was mostly a result of an 8-percent increase in 
prices of services.  Prices of non-food products increased by 1 
percent and prices in public catering by 0.8 percent, despite the 
fact that food prices were almost stagnant, increasing by 0.1 
percent.  The average yearly inflation was 19.8 percent, and 
consumer prices rose by 10.9 percent in January compared with the 
same period last year.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Feb 
94 p 9 AU) 

   COMPENSATION FOR VICTIMS OF 1950'S DISCRIMINATION:  Today, 
Minister of Labor and Social Affairs Jindrich Vodicka told 
journalists of the government decree approved on February 9 
providing compensation for pensioners whose pensions were reduced by 
discriminatory laws of the 1950's.  According to these laws the 
pensions of political prisoners, entrepreneurs, tradespeople, and 
their family members were reduced of taken away.  Although the 
pensions of these people were eventually brought into line, they 
never received compensation for the years during which they 
collected lower pensions.  Therefore the government chose the form 
of a lump sum payment, Vodicka said.  (Prague CTK in English 1756 
GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   GAMBRINUS LEADING CZECH BEER PRODUCER IN 1993:  The Gambrinus 
brewery, part of the brewing company Plzenske Pivovary (Pilsner 
Breweries) Plzen, became the country's biggest producer and seller 
of beer last year, said the company's commercial director Mario 
Junek.  Gambrinus produced 1,359,145 hectoliters of beer and sold 
1,182,788 hectoliters.  The total production of Plzenske Pivovary 
last year was 3,063,850 hectoliters of beer.  Gambrinus's share of 
this was 44 percent.  Next came Plzensky Prazdroj with 1,149,453 
hectoliters, a 37.5 percent share.  The cheaper beer Primus, 
introduced onto the market last June, sold 405,000 hectoliters, said 
Junek.  (Prague CTK in English 1822 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH, FRENCH TRANSPORT MINISTERS DISCUSS CSA:  Czech Transport 
Minister Jan Strasky and his French Counterpart Bernard Bosson met 
on 17 February to discuss transport issues of interest to both 
countries.  Reviewing the situation in the Czech Airlines (CSA) and 
the question of the Czech state buying back some of its stock 
previously sold to Air France, the ministers agreed that a rapid 
solution must be found among the airline's three main shareholders, 
a Transport Ministry spokesman told CTK on 18 February.  The 
ministers pledged they would urge the negotiating parties' to adopt 
a constructive and accommodating attitude, the spokesman said. 
(Prague CTK in English 2023 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   PARLIAMENT PASSES BILL ON LOCAL TAXES, EXCLUDES ALCOHOL:  The 
Czech Parliament today approved an amendment to the law on local 
taxes that will adjust taxation levels on restaurant seating 
capacity, educational resorts, and fees for renting billboard space. 
According to the amendment, the taxes on restaurants and educational 
resorts will be levied only on enterprises in tourist and spa areas. 
In passing the amendment, parliament bypassed a government proposal 
for local taxes on the sale of alcoholic beverages.  According to 
the parliamentary deputies, this kind of tax does not have a raison 
d'etre in the tax system because alcoholic beverages are already 
sufficiently taxed by the consumption tax collected by the central 
government.  (Prague CTK in English 2239 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   GALENA OPAVA TO BE BOUGHT BY U.S. COMPANY:  IVAX, a U.S. producer 
of medicinal drugs, will acquire the majority share of Galena Opava, 
which is one of the most important Czech pharmaceutical companies. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE WITH BRITAIN GROWS 45 PERCENT:  Trade between Britain and 
the Czech Republic grew 45 percent, reaching over 500 million pounds 
sterling, Britain's central statistical office told CTK on Monday, 
21 February.  British firms sold the Czechs 287 million pounds worth 
of goods -- office equipment and supplies and electrical equipment 
accounting for the largest share, while Czech producers sold goods 
worth 245 million pounds in Britain.  Leading Czech goods included 
Skoda-produced cars -- 10,000 were sold in the United Kingdom last 
year -- followed by non-ferrous metal products and electrical 
machinery ana equipment.  About 2.5 million pounds worth of Czech 
beer was sold in Britain as well.  European Union import quotas have 
meant little problems for Czech exporters, British businessmen told 
CTK in London.  (Prague CTK in English 1638 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   SKODA PLZEN TO SELL TROLLEYS TO U.S. CITY:  Skoda Plzen has 
bought 47 percent of the equity of Electric Transit International, 
and through this U.S. company it will sell 61 Skoda 14-Tr trolley- 
buses to the city of Dayton, Ohio.  This information was provided by 
the Skoda spokesman in Plzen on 20 February.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA 
DNES in Czech 21 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA TO RECOGNIZE ONLY SOME CZECH CUSTOMS CERTIFICATES: 
Slovakia has agreed on mutual recognition of national certificates 
required for import only for goods where the identical standards are 
in effect on both sides of the Czech-Slovak border.  Slovakia thus 
rejected the Czech proposal of mutual recognition of decisions and 
certificates for all commodities regardless of differences in state 
norms.  The decision was reached at a meeting of representatives of 
both the Czech Republic and Slovakia today, led by Michal Tosovsky 
and Lubomir Sutek, chairmen of the National Offices for Technical 
Normalization, Metrology, and State Testing. 

   Regarding food products, as of April 1, the Slovak Agricultural 
and Food Inspectorate will issue a single certificate valid for 
Slovakia.  The decisions taken by the Czech authorities will form 
the basis of the issuing of the certificate.  Until 31 March, the 
Slovak customs authorities will require the same documents they 
required before 11 February, when the Slovak customs authorities 
announced that food products without a Slovak quality certificate 
would not be allowed to enter the country.  (Prague CTK in English 
2129 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECHS TO INSIST ON DOMESTIC CONTENT FOR SKODA CARS:  During the 
upcoming talks on supplements to the contract between carmaker Skoda 
of Mlada Boleslav and Volkswagen, Czech negotiators will insist that 
Skoda be not turned into a mere assembly plant, Tomas Jezek, 
chairman of the National Property Fund said today.  He added that 
the main parts of Skoda-produced vehicles, such as the motor and 
transmission, should be produced in the Czech Republic.  This was 
decided by Czech representatives at a meeting at the Ministry of 
Trade and Industry on Monday, 21 February, Jezek said.  The Czechs 
agreed on their approach and are now "well prepared for the 
negotiations," Trade and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy added. 

   An analysis of the issue, presented at Monday's meeting, clearly 
specified the developmental goals that are to be part of the 
supplements to the contract, Dlouhy said.  Volkswagen should support 
the sale of 30 percent of Skoda's shares, and help resolve 
environmental problems and matters regarding guarantees, Dlouhy 
reported.  The State-owned Prisko company, that owns 69 percent of 
Skoda's shares, will not be discussed during the forthcoming 
negotiations, Jezek stated.  The FNM's stand on Prisko could differ 
from the Ministry's only in the question of how to terminate it, he 
added.  Prisko, that was established to settle restitution and 
environmental problems and to take care of Skoda's loans and 
liabilities, was meant to be terminated at a certain point, Jezek 
said.  (Prague CTK in English 2053 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   NO TALKS 'SO FAR' ON T-72 PARTS TO IRAN:  Industry and Trade 
Minister Vladimir Dlouhy told CTK on 22 February that, so far, no 
one has discussed the possibility of exporting spare parts for 
Czech-made T-72 tanks to Iran.  The current issue of the political 
weekly RESPEKT reports that, in January, Jan Vlcek, director of the 
RDP Group arms maker consortium, wrote to Dlouhy to ask for his help 
in obtaining a license to export arms to Iran.  According to 
RESPEKT, Dlouhy sent Vlcek's letter to the Defense, Interior, and 
Foreign Ministries and is still awaiting replies before making final 
comments.  The letter also mentioned financial advantages for the 
Czech Republic in such a deal.  The project would last for five 
years and bring in about $500 million, an amount that would help 
stagnant arms makers supply components for the T-72.  This could 
also fundamentally influence the employment situation, especially in 
the Moravian region, Vlcek said in his letter.  It would also 
activate the arms industry in general and open the way to 
cooperation between Czech manufacturers and those in NATO countries. 
(Prague CTK in English 1724 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   KLAUS, TOSOVSKY DISAGREE ON KORUNA CONVERTIBILITY:  The debate on 
when the Czech koruna should become convertible has divided even 
those economists and politicians who formerly held similar views, 
MLADA FRONTA DNES Editor Petr Wawrosz writes in the weekly magazine 
REFLEX in an article called "Duel:  The Convertibility of the 
Koruna."  There is a duel between Czech Premier Vaclav Klaus, who 
does not consider full convertibility to be necessary yet, and 
National Bank Governor Josef Tosovsky, who believes that it could be 
introduced as early as next year.One thing is certain, Wawrosz says. 
Convertibility, like privatization and ttade liberalization is one 
of the basic goals of Czech reform.  Logically it ties in with the 
steps that have already been taken, and it is therefore no surprise 
that it is now beginning to receive more attention.  The 
introduction of convertibility has to precede the Czech Republic's 
entrance into the European Union, being a necessary condition of 
acceptance, without which the Czechs have no claim on a United 
Europe, he says. 

   On the other hand, Czech people and firms will be wanting to make 
more use of foreign financial institutions.  Capital will flow 
freely and, understandably, most of it will head for the most 
attractive conditions and opportunities.  Naturally, the koruna's 
exchange rate will depend much more on the rate of other currencies, 
above all the German mark and the U.S. dollar, and on stability in 
the Czech Republic and in the surrounding countries.  Speaking of 
stability inflation should be mentioned, which is higher in the 
Czech Republic than in the West.  It would be ideal, Wawrosz says, 
if inflation did not exceed 6 percent per after convertibility in 
introduced, which is a situation which can be achieved within two 
years, the magazine believes.  Greater movement of capital 
necessarily brings greater foreign competition.  If the Czechs are 
not to keep up with much greater foreign competition, convertibility 
will do more harm than good, he believes.  (Prague CTK in English 
1426 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   JANUARY INFLATION 1.83 PERCENT:  Prices in the Czech Republic 
rose 1.83 percent in January.  The increase in prices for rented 
housing, petrol, and transportation accounted for 1.03 percent, 
Czech Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus said on 10 February.  (Prague CTK 
in English 2025 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   NON-GOVERNMENT ORGANIZATIONS TO RECEIVE PHARE SUPPORT:  More than 
$10 million will be set aside from the European Union's (EU) PHARE 
program to support non-government organizations in Central and 
Eastern Europe and in the states of the former Soviet Union, 
representatives of a delegation from the EU commission said 10 
February.  The project is aimed at granting support to those 
organizations that participate in the development of science and 
education through a variety of projects.  The program is divided 
into macro-and microprojects.  Macroprojects can obtain support from 
$12,000 to $165,000.  The condition is that more than one post- 
communist country and at least two non-government organizations from 
EU countries participate in them.  Microprojects are carried out 
only in one country and non-government organizations can receive 
from $3,500 to 12,000.  PHARE's support has thus far concentrated 
especially on health care, environmental protection, human rights 
and similar purposes.  Central European non-government organizations 
have thus far obtained 11 million Czech korunas ($366,000) from 
PHARE.  (Prague CTK in English 2026 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   PARTICIPATION IN INDIAN GAS PIPELINE PROJECT SOUGHT:  The Czech 
Republic wants to participate in the construction of an extensive 
gas pipeline network that would stretch from Iran and Oman to India 
and neighboring states, Czech Deputy Minister of Industry and Trade 
Radomir Sabela said on 10 February.  Sabela, who is accompanying 
Czech President Vaclav Havel on his current visit to India and 
Thailand, said the Czech Republic intends to enter a public tender 
to be announced by the Indian government.  The pipeline is expected 
to start operating in 1998.  If we succeed in taking part in the 
construction of the gas pipeline, it would be a big opportunity for 
Czech industry, Sabela said.  The project's value is estimated at 
several billion U.S. dollars, and a loan may be granted by the World 
Bank or the Asian Development Bank (ADB), Sabela added. 

   Finance Minister Ivan Kocarnik, who is also accompanying Havel, 
said in reference to the financing of Czech investments in India 
that India had significantly multiplied its foreign currency 
reserves, which now total about $14 billion.  Moreover, a number of 
projects will probably be financed by the World Bank or the ADB. 
India could obtain also cheap long-term loans, according to 
Kocarnik.  Investments by our side, for instance through a 
consortium of banks, should not be ruled out either, Kocarnik said. 
He added that the Czech Republic is interested in becoming an ADB 
member. 

   Sabela told journalists that the construction of an oil 
derivatives pipeline in north-western India, in which Czech firms 
will participate, is expected to start by February 17 at the latest. 
The contract for building the pipeline, valued at $356 million, was 
signed by the Czech Firm Skodaexport last year.  Havel called it the 
Czech Republic's largest investment abroad.  Sabela also spoke of 
Czech-Indian cooperation in the aviation industry.  In the civilian 
area we have delivered two L-410 planes (from Let Kunovice) and 
another two are on the way, he said.  L-410 can take 17 passengers. 
The planes have been bought by an Indian private firm that is 
interested also in L-610 model planes that can take about 40 people. 
The Czech delegation is to discuss specific forms of military 
cooperation with the Indian Minister of Defense.  (CTK in English 
2037 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   INTENT OF SLOVAK FOOD REGULATIONS QUESTIONED:  Slovakia's 
decision to require certificates of quality for food products is a 
pretext for reducing food imports, National Property Fund Chairman 
Tomas Jezek said 11 February.  It is an excuse to achieve the effect 
that would be attained directly by imposing duty on the goods, Jezek 
said.  It is a move that is not allowed under the customs agreement 
between the Czech and Slovak Republics, he added.  Jezek said he 
believed the Customs Union Council would have to meet because of the 
decision.  It is a way of restricting imports without breaking the 
customs agreement, he explained.  Jezek mentioned the protection of 
domestic producers and Slovakia's clearing account deficit with the 
Czech Republic as reasons for the step.  Devaluation of the Slovak 
koruna would be a direct solution, but the Slovak Government fears 
it for political reasons, Jezek said.  A partial list of the goods 
requiring a quality certificate by either the Health Ministry or the 
Agriculture and Food Inspection Authority for imports includes beer, 
dairy products, tea, rice, most dry legumes, sunflower and olive 
oil, dried and salted fish, some spices, buckwheat and millet. 
(Prague CTK in English 2143 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   SLOVAK CERTIFICATE REQUIREMENT JAMS BORDER CROSSINGS:  A total of 
12 trucks with food leaving the Czech Republic for Slovakia were not 
allowed to enter the country by the Slovak Customs Office as they 
did not have certificates from the Slovak Agriculture and Food 
Inspection Authority or the Slovak Health Ministry.  The Slovak 
Government adopted a decision with effect since February 11 whereby 
food products without a certificate for their quality would not be 
allowed to enter the country. 

   Earlier this month Slovak Finance Minister Julius Toth said that 
a solution to the current trade deficit in relation to the Czech 
Republic should be looked for elsewhere, the introduction of an 
import surcharge is as yet out of the question.  The introduction -- 
in two stages -- of special border controls for imported goods is 
being considered.  First food control should be implemented.  During 
the second stage control will be expanded to cover all sorts of 
goods.  The time period of the second stage has not yet been 
specified. 

   Some Czech-Slovak border crossings were virtually blocked to cars 
and railway carriages today.  Some drivers did not know about the 
change.  The move will largely affect Moravian exporters who supply 
the Slovak cross-border area with food every day, a local customs 
official said, adding that some of them learnt about the move only 
from the radio.  (Prague CTK in English 1836 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   SLOVAK CUSTOMS MEASURE BIG MISTAKE, DLOUHY SAYS:  Thursday's 
decision of the Slovak Customs Authorities not to allow food 
products without a quality certificate to enter the country is the 
first major mistake in the functioning of the Czech-Slovak Customs 
Union, Trade and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy said 11 February. 
Dlouhy said he would ask for the Customs Union Council to be called. 
Slovakia was attempting to protect the balance of payments by 
misusing technical obstacles to trade in a situation where such 
steps were indefensible, he said.  The Czech Republic was informed 
of the measure only 24 hours before it came into effect, he said. 
Slovakia had merely carried out its formal obligations, but usually 
in similar cases the supplier is given more time to adapt to the new 
conditions, Dlouhy said.  The Customs Union Agreement allows either 
country to take such a measure if it is essential for the protection 
of life or health of people, animals or plants, he pointed out, but 
in his view this was not the case.  The measure is directed against 
all countries, not just the Czech Republic, he added.  (Prague CTK 
in English 1232 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   KLAUS ASKS MECIAR TO DROP NEW REGULATION:  Czech Prime Minister 
Vaclav Klaus telephoned Slovak Prime Minister Vladimir Meciar to ask 
Slovakia to abandon its requirement that all imported food products 
carry a quality certificate, Klaus said on 11 February today after 
the cabinet had debated the measure.  He said Meciar promised him 
the Slovak Government would seriously consider Klaus's request. 
(Prague CTK in English 1719 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   CZECH-UKRAINIAN JOINT VENTURE:  The IVEGOTOV company is a new 
Czech-Ukrainian joint venture established between Jihospol 
Strakonice and entrepreneur Alexander Dolisny.  The company will be 
engaged in trading activity and will run the Slavia chain of 
restaurants.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 

   MANN, HUMMEL ACQUIRES 60 PERCENT OF PAPER MILL:  Europe's largest 
producer of car filters, Mann and Hummel GmbH of Germany, has 
acquired 60 percent of Jihlavske Papirny (South Moravian Paper 
Mills) in Pribyslavice.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Feb 
94 p 6 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT RATE 3.78 PERCENT IN JANUARY:  On January 31, Czech 
job centers registered 198,837 job seekers, amounting to a 3.78- 
percent unemployment rate, the highest since February 1992, Ota 
Veverka, spokesman of the Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs, said 
11 February.  The lowest unemployment was as traditionally in 
Prague, at 0.36 percent, while the number of jobs offered -- 14,184 
-- was the highest.  (Prague CTK in English 1721 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   HUNGARY 

   EXPORTS TO EU DOWN 22.3 PERCENT IN 1993:  Despite the favorable 
effects of the association agreement with the European Union (EU), 
Hungary's exports to the EU fell by 22.3 percent last year as 
compared to the overall 16.8 percent decline in Hungarian exports, 
figures published by the Ministry of International Economic 
Relations show.  Hungary's exports to EU countries totalled $4,145.7 
million in 1993 and the proportion of total exports going to the EU 
fell from 49.8 percent in 1992 to 46.5 percent last year.  Although 
imports from the EU grew by 6.5 percent, this was less than the 
overall 13.2 percent increase in imports.  As a result, the share of 
EU products in total Hungarian imports fell from 42.8 percent in 
1992 to 40.2 percent last year.  Portugal was the only EU member 
country to take more Hungarian exports, with a 12 percent ($0.7 
million) increase last year.  With the exception of Britain, imports 
from all EU countries increased last year.  The largest fall in 
exports was registered with Spain (down 48.5 percent to $65.3 
million) although imports from Spain rose 54.4 percent to $105.6 
million.  Imports from Ireland showed the largest increase (64.9 
percent to $26.4 million) and Hungarian exports showed the lowest 
fall (1.1 percent to $4.1 million).  Exports to Germany, Hungary's 
main trading partner, fell 20 percent to $2,376 million while 
imports rose by 4 percent to $2,713.1 million last year.  Exports to 
Italy, Hungary's second largest EU trade partner, fell 30.1 percent 
to $713.5 million while imports rose 7.5 percent to $750.3 million. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1238 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   BUSINESS TAKES OUT MORE FOREX LOANS IN 1993:  Hungarian 
businesses took more loans from abroad last year than from Hungarian 
commercial banks, allocated most of their free assets in foreign 
exchange, and did not increase forint deposits significantly, the 
latest monthly report of the Hungarian National Bank shows.  The net 
stock of credits of the business sector fell slightly last year, 
from 251.6 billion forints (HUF) to HUF 240.1 billion, although part 
of the companies' stock of loans were drawn away from banks in debt 
and credit consolidation.  In 1993 the stock of gross bank loans of 
businesses decreased by HUF 15 billion as a result of credit 
consolidation and by an additional HUF 30-42 billion in debt 
consolidation.  As a result, the real stock of gross bank loans of 
businesses increased last year by HUF 105-117 billion.  Leaving out 
the effects of credit and debt consolidation, the stock of loans 
increased by HUF 59.5 billion to HUF 763.5 billion.  Consolidation 
did not affect the stock of company foreign exchange deposits, which 
grew by the equivalent of HUF 4.5 billion last year to HUF 64.7 
billion. 

   The increase in forint terms includes a total 15 percent 
devaluation of the forint over the year.  Within the HUF 59.5 
billion increase, the stock of investment loans dropped by HUF 16.8 
billion, to HUF 115.2 billion.  Taking consolidation into account, 
the drop is around HUF 6.4-7.9 billion.  The stock of working 
capital loans increased by HUF 56.4 billion last year, as opposed to 
a HUF 19 billion drop in the previous year (without consolidation). 
The real increase, including credit and debt consolidation, was 
around HUF 92-102 billion.  The stock of net direct foreign loans of 
the business sector rose by $800 million in 1993 while the total 
stock reached HUF 1.8 billion.  Seventy percent of the total loans 
were of more than one year's maturity, 22 percent were granted by 
foreign parent companies to subsidiaries in Hungary, 49 percent were 
for less than $10 million, and 30 percent were for more than $50 
million. 

   Deposits of businesses grew by HUF 71 billion in 1993, HUF 66 
billion of which occurred in the last 10 days of the year.  HUF 63 
billion of the total increase was in the stock of foreign exchange 
deposits, although the forint devaluation must also be taken into 
account.  Within the growth of foreign exchange deposits HUF 42 
billion was the result of the privatization of MATAV.  The forint 
deposits of businesses grew by only HUF 8 billion last year. Of 
this, the stock of fixed forint deposits dropped by HUF 7 billion 
while the deposits on current accounts grew by HUF 15 billion. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1716 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   ECONOMY IN 1993:  The volume of industrial production, excluding 
seasonal variations, fell by 3.7 percent in December, while retail 
sales increased by 2.6 percent, the Central Statistical Office 
reports.  Industrial producer prices rose by 0.8 percent, domestic 
producer prices by 0.4 percent and retail prices by 1.3 percent in 
December.  Industrial production showed a 4 percent increase over 
the whole of 1993, while agricultural production fell by 6 percent, 
with livestock breeding 9 percent and plant cultivation 4 percent 
down on 1992.  Energy consumption was 1 percent higher in 1993 than 
in the preceding year.  Within this, industrial energy consumption 
dropped by 1 percent, and that of households and public services 
rose by 2.7 percent.  There was a decrease in consumption of coal, 
nuclear energy, and imported electricity, but more oil and gas were 
used.  Fifty-two percent of energy resources were imported, as 
compared to 49 percent in 1992.  Following a 1.6 percent drop in 
1992, total investment in 1993 remained stable at 626 billion 
forints, according to preliminary data.  Annual consumer inflation 
last year was 22.5 percent, against 23 percent in 1992 and 35 
percent in 1991.  Both industrial producer prices and domestic 
wholesale prices rose by 11 percent in 1993, with agricultural 
producer and purchase prices going up by 25 percent, following a 9 
percent rise in 1992.  Wages increased by 18 percent last year, but 
fell in real terms by 3 to 4 percent.  Average gross salaries were 
22 percent higher and net salaries 18 percent higher than a year 
before.  The retail trade volume was about the same as in the 
previous year.  Private savings increased more than in 1992. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0720 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   BUDGET SURPLUS 8.5 BILLION FORINTS AT END OF JANUARY:  Hungary's 
state budget showed a surplus of 8.5 billion forints (HUF) at the 
end of January, the Finance Ministry announced.  Revenue amounted to 
HUF 127 billion, while expenditure stood at HUF 118.5 billion.  Net 
budget revenue from businesses amounted to HUF 25 billion, of the 
HUF 200.2 billion targeted for the whole year.  Corporate tax 
payments amounted to HUF 5.8 billion in the first month.  Customs 
duties and import-related revenue to the state budget amounted to 
more than HUF 11.6 billion at the end of January, 11.9 percent of 
the full year target.  Budget subsidies to businesses amounted to 
HUF 5.57 billion in January.  Budget revenue from consumption 
related taxes amounted to HUF 43.754 billion in the first month of 
the year.  The budget spent HUF 2.5 billion on consumer price 
subsidies.  The state budget received HUF 21.75 billion in taxes and 
other payments from individuals in the first month.  Income tax 
payments of HUF 20 billion went to the central budget in January. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1235 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   TALKS OVER EXTENSION OF JAPANESE CREDIT LINE:  Commercial banks 
have made commitments to disburse the entire 23 billion forints in 
credit granted equally by Eximbank of Japan and the Hungarian 
National Bank (MNB), although the full amount has not yet been drawn 
from the central bank.  The MNB is currently negotiating with 
Eximbank for opening up a further credit line with similar 
conditions and hopes to sign an agreement in the first half of this 
year.  The commercial banks said that there was demand for an amount 
at least equivalent to the previous credit line.  The MNB signed an 
agreement with Eximbank in December 1992 on a 13 billion Japanese 
yen credit line, which had been granted by the Japanese government 
to promote small and medium-sized Hungarian businesses.  The central 
bank in turn contributed an equal amount.  (Budapest MTI in English 
0745 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   JAPANESE BANK LENDS DM 85 MILLION TO TELECOM:  Hungarian Telecom 
(MATAV) is getting an 85 million German marks (DM) (5 billion 
forints) loan from Japan's Eximbank.  As announced in Tokyo, 
depending on changes in currency exchange rates, the sum might rise 
to 6.2 billion Japanese yen, which is about 6 billion forints.  This 
is the first large loan this banking institute, with the Japanese 
Government, has given to a Central European private firm.  The 
Hungarian Ministry of Finance guaranteed repayment underwriting the 
loan.  This is the first European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD) and Japanese Eximbank jointly funded project.  A 
general agreement was reached by the two banking institutes two 
years ago, followed by negotiations starting last April.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1729 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   FREE TRADE AGREEMENT WITH FINLAND COMES INTO FORCE:  The Finland- 
Hungary free trade agreement and the related agricultural protocol 
came into effect on 1 March.  Hungary signed agreements on the free 
trade of industrial products and bilateral protocols on agricultural 
trade with all members of the European Free Trade Association (EFTA) 
-- including Finland -- in Geneva on March 29, 1993.  Due to the 
protraction of the ratification process in the Finnish Parliament, 
the Hungarian-Finnish agreements came into effect only on 1 March. 
Hungarian-Finnish trade of industrial goods has been liberalized 
since 1974.  The new free trade agreement has extended the scope of 
duty-free commodities to some important export items of Hungarian 
agriculture, including meat and meat products, honey, fresh, frozen 
and preserved vegetables, fruit and fruit juice.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1707 GMT 2 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNITED STATES ORDERS -102 IKARUS BUSES:  Hungary's Ikarus Co. has 
received an order from Miami for 102 articulated buses.  The first 
30 buses will be made by the company's Budapest plant, with the rest 
to be produced and sold to America by the Budapest-based Hungarian- 
U.S. joint venture NABI (Nord American Bus Industria).  Ikarus has 
been selling buses to the United States for 15 years (since 1988) 
via Ikarus-USA, which was formerly a subsidiary of UCBC, a transport 
and small-lorry manufacturer.  The venture turned out buses suited 
to American demands -- type 400 -- with U.S. main components and a 
Hungarian chassis and body.  Over 400 buses made this way are 
currently running in Houston, San Diego, and Pittsburg.  Besides the 
United States, NABI will sell buses to Canada and Mexico.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1338 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   GASOLINE PRICES UP, DIESEL PRICES DOWN:  As of 1 March, petrol 
will cost 1 forint more and diesel oil four forints less per liter 
at pump-stations run by Hungary's oil and gas trust (MOL).  The 
petrol price rise follows oil price increases on international 
markets and the 2.6 percent devaluation of the forint on 16 
February.  The price of diesel will be lowered because MOL has extra 
stocks on hand.  MOL accounts for some 30 percent of domestic car- 
fuel supply.  Other fuel companies have not yet indicated they will 
to join MOL's rate adjustment.  However, they usually follow the 
same price policy.  (Budapest MTI in English 1205 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   COMPENSATION TO FOREIGN CITIZENS:  Of the 120 billion forints 
(HUF) nominal value of compensation coupons so far issued, foreign 
citizens have received 16.4 billion forints, the Compensation Office 
reported.  The Office estimates that the total value of compensation 
coupons to be granted to foreign citizens will eventually be HUF 21 
billion, which represents 15 percent of the total value of 
compensation coupons to be issued.  The original period for 
applications for compensation has been extended until 15 March.  The 
office estimates that the extension will involve the issue of a 
further HUF 3 billion worth of compensation coupons.  Under the 
First Law on Compensation, passed in 1991, those who lost property 
after 8 June, 1949 receive partial compensation.  The Second Law 
deals with compensation for loss of property between 1 May, 1939 and 
8 June, 1949.  The Third Law covers compensation for those 
persecuted for political reasons and this is the law under which the 
bulk of compensation to foreign citizens falls.  The largest value 
of compensation coupons (HUF 6.3 billion) has gone to Romanian 
citizens.  German citizens have received coupons worth HUF 3 
billion, and US citizens HUF 1.4 billion.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1437 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT RATE 12.8 PERCENT IN JANUARY:  There were about 
9,000 more registered unemployed at the end of January than a month 
earlier, to bring the total number of people on the dole to 641,000, 
the National Labor Centre said.  The proportion between the 
unemployed and the economically active population -- that is the 
unemployment rate -- was 12.8 percent nationally.  There are major 
differences in the unemployment rate per region:  In the northern 
Borsod-Abauj-Zemplen county it is 21.1 percent, in Szabolcs-Szatmar- 
Bereg county 20.6, and in Nograd county 19.1 percent.  At the same 
time, it is 6.3 percent in Budapest, 8.8 percent in the western 
Gyor-Sopron-Moson county, and 9.3 percent in Pest county.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 0726 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   EXPORTS DOWN 16.8 PERCENT IN 1993:  Exports amounted to $8.907 
billion last year, down 16.8 percent on 1992, Minister of 
International Economic Relations Bela Kadar said.  Imports totalled 
$12.530 billion, but this sum includes $713 million worth of MiG 
fighter planes given by Russia to Hungary in partial repayment of 
trade debts accumulated in rubles before the dissolution of the 
Council for Mutual Economic Assistance (CEMA).  When the fighter 
planes are deducted, imports total $11.817 billion, 6.8 percent up 
on the previous year. 

   Government moves made last September to boost exports and improve 
the trade balance resulted in a tangible rise in exports in the 
fourth quarter of last year.  While the monthly average of exports 
in the first nine months was $716 million, it rose to $820 million 
for the last three months of the year and to $866 million in 
December.  Customs statistics showed a trade deficit of $3.623 
billion for last year, including the import of the MiG fighters. 
The trade deficit amounted to $2.910 billion, not including the 
import of MiG fighters, and to $2.280 billion when other import 
items that do not appear in the current account were deducted. 
Exports of agricultural goods and food products fell by 26.6 
percent, while exports of consumer goods fell by 20 percent.  The 
export of products manufactured on commission fell $758 million, 
exports of grain were down $384 million, and food exports were $246 
million less than in 1992.  The latter three items made up 77 
percent of the decrease in exports last year. 

   Ninety percent of the decrease in exports was in sales to 
industrialized countries.  Western Europe continued to suffer from 
the recession, with 64 to 65 percent of Hungary's exports going to 
countries like Germany, Austria, Italy, France, and the Benelux 
countries.  The currencies of all of these countries depreciated 
against the dollar last year.  Exports decreased by about 10 percent 
in volume terms when adjustments were made in connection with the 
appreciation of the dollar.  Exports to former socialist countries 
made up 26 percent of total exports last year, while imports from 
these countries made up 29 percent of the total.  Exports to the 
United States rose by 9 percent, exports to Poland were up 12 
percent, exports to Slovenia were up 30 percent, and exports to the 
Czech Republic and Slovakia were each up 2 percent.  Figures for 
trade with Poland, the Czech Republic, and Slovakia in the second 
half of 1993 had already begun to show the effect of the free trade 
agreement signed early last year that abolished customs duties and 
import quotas for 50 percent of industrial goods. 

   Imports of consumer goods from the former socialist countries 
rose by 59 percent within an overall increase of 7 percent.  This 
compares to a 2 percent rise in imports of consumer goods from 
industrialized countries.  Agricultural exports fell by $700 million 
compared to the previous year, while imports rose by $100 million. 
Half the increase was accounted for by products that were not in 
direct competition with Hungarian produce, such as tropical and 
citrus fruit.  Exports of machinery fell by 3 percent, while imports 
rose by 15.1 percent, excluding the MiG-fighter planes but including 
$150 million worth of Boeing aircraft bought by the Hungarian 
airline, MALEV.  The decline in the import of investment goods 
ceased.  (Budapest MTI in English 1159 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   INCREASED TRADE WITH VISEGRAD COUNTRIES:  Hungarian sales to 
Poland increased by 12 percent last year, with 2 percent export 
growth with the Czech Republic and Slovakia.  Hungary's sales to the 
other Visegrad states -- Czech Republic, Poland, Slovakia -- rose 
from 4 percent to 4.7 percent as a ratio of its total exports in 
1993.  In the same year, imports from these countries fell from 5.9 
percent to 4.7 percent of the total.  Thanks to Central European 
Free Trade Area (CEFTA) customs preferences, Hungary's 1993 exports 
to Poland grew by $17 million to $160 million, and included more 
buses, bus parts, instruments, and medicines than a year before. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0954 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   FORINT RATE CHANGES IN LAST 12 MONTHS:  Over the last 12 months, 
the forint lost 26.8 percent on the Swiss franc and stayed stable 
against the Spanish peseta, a Hungarian National Bank summary 
published after the 2.6 percent devaluation of the Hungarian 
currency on February 16 shows.  Accordingly, the forint lost 24 
percent on the British pound and 20 percent on the U.S. dollar in 
one year.  Its loss on the German mark, decisive for Hungarian 
foreign trade, was "merely" 15 percent, the same as against the 
Austrian schilling.  The forint lost 10.6 percent of its value 
against the Italian lira, and 6.4 percent against the Greek drachma. 
There were six forint devaluations, by a total of 17 percent, 
between February 16, 1993 and February 16, 1994.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1359 GMT 16 Feb 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT PLANS TO SET UP EXIMBANK:  The government proposes 
separating export-related banking and insurer's functions.  The 
cabinet decided to submit a bill on setting up the Hungarian Export- 
Import Bank Co. and the Hungarian Export Credit Insurance Co. to 
Parliament for urgent discussion.  Under the bill, Eximbank will be 
in charge of export financing and guaranteeing, with the Export 
Credit Insurance Company insuring export loans.  So far, both 
functions have been fulfilled by the Export Guarantee Insurance Co., 
whose 2 billion forints equity is to be divided between the two 
wholly state-owned joint-stock companies.  (Budapest MTI in English 
0736 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTORS PREFER HUNGARY, CZECH REPUBLIC:  Hungary and 
the Czech Republic have been the most popular East European venues 
for foreign investors since political changes in 1990, according to 
Vienna's Economic Research Institute.  The survey shows that over 
the past four years, considerably more foreign capital has entered 
these two countries than, for example, Greece, a European Union 
member.  They owe their attraction to political and economic 
stability, as well as rapid privatization of state assets.  Foreign 
investments in Hungary were worth $5 billion over the past three 
years.  Last year's privatization of 30 percent of the Hungarian 
Telecommunications Co.  (MATAV), led by Deutsche Telekom, earned the 
central budget 800 million forints.  Official figures indicate the 
Czech Republic has received $2.3 billion in foreign investment since 
the collapse of communist rule.  (Budapest MTI in English 1137 GMT 
23 Feb 94 AU) 

   JANUARY PERSONAL SAVINGS DATA: 

             Personal Savings (in billion Forints) 

                             1993               1994 

                        Jan 1   Jan 31    Jan 1   Jan 31(x) 
Households              269.6   263.6     319.7   307.1 
Bank Deposits           582.4   598.2     694.0   702.2 
   Within Which: 
  Forint Deposit       429.8    437.4     489.4    488.6 
 Accumulated Interest  ---        4.0     ---        5.0 
  Foreign Currency     152.6    156.8     204.6    210.6 
Bank Securities        190.9    194.2     202.7    208.1 

Total                1,042.9  1,056.0   1,216.4  1,217.4 

Non-Bank Securities(xx) 87.0     87.2     116.1    126.3 
Insurance Premiums      41.3     43.3      51.0     51.0 

Total                1,171.2  1,186.5   1,383.5  1,394.7 
Personal Loans         252.3    255.1     284.0    289.0 
Net Savings            918.9    931.4   1,099.5  1,105.6 



(x) -- preliminary figures (xx) -- estimated 
Source:  Hungarian National Bank 

(Budapest MTI in English 1218 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   GYOR AUDI PLANT TO MAKE 1,000 ENGINES PER DAY:  Audi engines 
assembled by Audi's wholly owned Hungarian subsidiary, Audi-Hungaria 
Motors Kf t, are currently being tested in Germany, with the company 
to begin producing 1,000 engines a day in the second half of this 
year.  Audi-Hungaria is based in Gyor (western Hungary).  The Gyor 
plant takes partly finished cylinder heads and overhead camshaf ts 
from Germany, which are then worked on further.  Other parts arrive 
ready made.  Audi is to invest a total of DM9OO million in the Gyor 
plant, with the factory expected to be turning out 2,000 to 2,500 
engines a day by 1998.  Audi will have invested DM3OO million in the 
first stage of development, which is to be completed this summer. 

   In the third stage [as received] of the project, to be carried 
out between 1996 and 1998, other engine parts will also be finished 
in the Gyor factory.  Audi has failed to find a Hungarian aluminum 
plant that is able to produce aluminum parts of the required 
quality, and Audi A.G. is now seeking a company from among its 
suppliers which is prepared to build a new plant near the Gyor 
factory.  (Budapest MTI in English 0743 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   JANUARY GAS CONSUMPTION:  Gas consumption this January amounted 
to 1.35 million cubic meters, about 70,000 cubic meters down on 
January 1993 and last December, when 1.42 million cubic meters were 
used per month, the Hungarian Oil and Gas Trust (MOL) reports.  Half 
of the gas quantity used in January -- about 700,000 cubic meters -- 
were supplied by gas distributors.  Some 200,000 cubic meters 
fuelled the power stations of the Hungarian Villamos (electricity) 
Works, and over 40,000 cubic meters were used by the Budapest Gas 
Works and the chemical industry together.  Of the 1.35 million cubic 
meters, 400,000 came from stores, another 400,000 was imported, and 
550,000 produced domestically.  A year ago, domestic gas production 
was 650,000 cubic meters, imports were some 420,000 and the 
consumption of stored gas was about the same as this year. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0725 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   MALEV TO LEASE BOEING 737-300:  The board of MALEV Hungarian 
airlines decided to lease a Boeing 737-300 for three years from the 
Los Angeles-based leasing company ILFC.  The leasing contract is 
expected to be signed at the beginning of March and the initial 
three-year lease period may be extended by a further two years. 
MALEV plans to accelerate the modernization of its aircraft through 
the phasing out of Tupolevs and the leasing of more modern planes. 
MALEV's financial situation, however, does not permit it to buy new 
planes.  The MALEV extraordinary general meeting originally planned 
for 6 March will now be held on 26 March.  One of the items on the 
agenda will be the approval of a sale and lease back arrangement for 
MALEV's two Boeing 767-2O0er planes.  (Budapest MTI in English 0713 
GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   FURTHER GROWTH IN NUMBER OF BUSINESSES:  There was an increase in 
the number of companies registered in January, with the number of 
incorporated businesses up from 85,638 to 87,060 from December to 
January, the latest figures from the Central Statistical Office 
(KSH) show.  Of the 1,595 companies that were registered in January, 
1,443 were new companies, while 152 were established from existing 
companies.  Ninety-two percent of the newly established companies 
were limited liabilty companies and 84 percent were companies 
employing less than 10 people.  Thirty-nine percent of the companies 
were based in Budapest. 

   In January, 173 incorporated companies ceased to operate:  Five 
of them were wound up, 66 ceased operating, and 102 were converted 
into other companies.  Bankruptcy proceedings were initiated against 
eight incorporated companies in January, bringing the total number 
of bankruptcy proceedings initiated since the beginning of 1992 to 
3,082.  Of the companies that went bankrupt, 32 percent had been 
involved in industry, 26 percent in trade and repair services, 14 
percent in construction, and 13 percent in agriculture and forestry. 
The KSH figures show that bankruptcy proceedings have been conducted 
against 2,444 companies.  In half of the cases a bankruptcy 
agreement was made.  Forty-eight percent of the companies were wound 
up and, in 2 percent of cases, the proceedings were in other ways. 
A total of 4,878 incorporated companies had been wound up by the end 
of January, 57 percent of which were limited liability companies and 
32 percent cooperatives.  Thirty percent of the companies wound up 
operated in industry, 25 percent in trade and repair services, 21 
percent in the construction industry, and 12 percent were real 
estate agents or engaged in other service areas. 

   The KSH figures showed that the following businesses were 
operating in Hungary.  The figures are based on Hungarian tax office 
(APEH) data. 
BOT 
Business                         Dec 31, 1993     Jan 31, 1994 

Incorporated Companies             85,638          87,060 
Unincorporated Businesses          98,036          99,512 
Budget and Social Security 
  Run Institutions                 14,853          14,882 
Other Non-Profit Organizations     38,493          38,523 
Self-Employed                     688,843         692,678 
EOT 
(Budapest MTI in English 1354 GMT  23 Feb  94 AU) 

   DOMESTIC SECURITIES ISSUES COVERED 1993 BUDGET DEFICIT:  The 1993 
central budget closed with a deficit of 199.7 billion forints. 
Revenues totalled 939.6 billion forints and expenditures, 1,139.3 
billion.  The deficit remained under the 213.3 billion forints mark 
envisaged in the supplementary budget.  The central budget deficit 
was fully financed from the issuing of domestic securities.  The 
state spent less on expenditures related to debt, with savings in 
this field totalling 9 billion forints, mainly due to lower interest 
expenditures.  The unfavorable effect of the rise in interest rates 
at the end of 1993 could hardly be felt.  Revenue from personal 
income tax totalled 210.7 billion forints, instead of the expected 
189.5 billion forints, as taxable incomes rose at a faster pace than 
planned.  Corporate tax revenues were also somewhat higher than 
predicted.  (Budapest MTI in English 1849 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   INCREASE IN CONSUMER PRICE INDEX SLOWS:  Consumer prices this 
January were up 3.2 percent on last December, the Central 
Statistical Office reported.  The monthly price increase last 
January was 6.8 percent.  The 12-month price index -- from January 
to January -- fell from 25.9 percent last year, to 17 percent. 
BOT 
                        1 Month                   12 Months 
                           Increase in Percentage 

                1992     1993    1994      1992      1993   1994 

January          3.2     6.8      3.2      28.2     25.9    17.0 
February         2.7     1.7               25.8     24.7 
March            1.9     0.8               24.7     23.4 
April            1.3     0.8               23.3     22.8 
May              1.5     0.4               22.6     21.3 
June             0.6     0.3               20.6     20.9 
July             0.3     0.6               20.1     21.3 
August           0.8     1.8               20.7     22.3 
September        2.4     2.9               21.7     23.0 
October          2.5     1.7               23.4     22.0 
November         1.6     0.7               22.7     21.0 
December         1.1     1.3               21.6     21.0 
EOT 
(Budapest MTI in English 1158 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   COMPANIES DRAW $1.264 BILLION IN FOREIGN LOANS IN 1993: 
Hungarian companies took out direct foreign exchange loans from 
abroad to a value of $1.264 billion in 1993, Econews learned from 
the Hungarian National Bank (MNB).  Total loans stood at $2.516 
billion on December 31, 1993, while company repayments totalled $691 
million between 1990, when such lending began, and the end of last 
year, of which $441 million was repaid in 1993.  The net stock of 
direct foreign loans owed by Hungarian companies stood at $1.825 
billion at the end of last year, compared to $1.002 billion at the 
end of 1992.  Hungarian companies held valid permits from the MNB 
for direct foreign loans totalling $4.008 billion at the end of 
December as against $2.536 billion on December 31, 1992. 

   Of the total $2.279 billion loans taken out, 22 percent were in 
the form of credits to joint ventures from their foreign owners, 7 
percent carried Hungarian state guarantees, while the value of loans 
over $50 million accounted for 24 percent of the total.  Of total 
permits valid at the end of December, 37 percent were for loans with 
maturity of up to one year.  The MNB started granting permits for 
such shorter-term direct foreign loans to companies in early 1993. 
In the maximum one-year category, companies took out loans to a 
total value of 1.061 billion and repaid $528 million last year, 
bringing the net stock of such loans to $533 million at the end of 
December.  The above MNB figures do not include foreign loans 
granted either by the World Bank or under inter-governmental loan 
agreements to Hungarian companies.  The above figures cover the 
principal amounts of loans and also reflect changes in foreign 
exchange cross-rates over the period.  (Budapest MTI in English 1719 
GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK DEVALUES FORINT 2.6 PERCENT:  The Hungarian 
National Bank has decided to devalue the forint by 2.6 percent as of 
February 16.  The reason given for the devaluation was the 
improvement of the competitiveness of Hungarian exports.  The MNB 
expects exporting companies to become increasingly profitable and 
thus able to maintain existing levels of employment.  The decision 
was also prompted by changes in currency exchange rates of Hungary's 
major trade partners.  The currency basket which provides the basis 
for the forint exchange rate calculation contains the U.S. dollar 
and the German mark in equal proportions.  The dollar has continued 
to strengthen against European currencies on international money 
markets and thus the forint rate has been pulled up by the dollar as 
compared to the European countries which provide Hungary's main 
export markets.  The MNB last devalued the forint by 1 percent on 
January 3.  In 1993, the forint was devalued by 15 percent in five 
steps.  (Budapest MTI in English 1755 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK PRESIDENT ON DEVALUATION:  The Hungarian forint has 
strengthened considerably, as compared to the German mark, since 
last October, which did not have justification by the internal 
processes of the economy.  "This is what necessitated the exchange 
rate correction," Hungarian National Bank Chairman Peter Akos Bod 
said on 15 February, accounting for the forint devaluation. 
According to Bod, the step will improve the situation of exporters. 
Lower indices have come about for both producer and consumer prices 
over the past months, which is why, as a consequence of the 
devaluation more than one year ago, there is less danger of 
inflation this February.  Subsequently, the national bank could 
decide in a bolder manner and on a larger-scale devaluation, Bod 
said.  (Budapest MTI in English 1810 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT HELP FOR BORSOD COUNTY STEEL INDUSTRY:  The government 
has decided on reorganizing steel production in Borsod County, 
northern Hungary.  Accordingly, the Ozd factory will produce 
electrosteel and upgrade its rolling mill, and the Diosgyor plant 
will boost the capacity of its existing electrofurnace and set up a 
second foundry.  The government will guarantee a loan of 2.1 billion 
forints ($1 equals 102 forints) for the program this year and grant 
nonrefundable support worth 3 billion forints after the industry is 
privatized.  (Budapest MTI in English 2007 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   LIVESTOCK NUMBERS FALL:  The continuous decline in livestock 
numbers invariably gives rise to anxiety, a Central Statistical 
Office report states.  According to the figures, the cattle stock 
totalled 999,000 on December 31, 1993, which is 14 percent, or 
160,000 less than in the previous year.  There were 5.001 million 
pigs at the end of last year, which is a decline of 7 percent over 
the previous year.  There are no prospects for a major rise as the 
number of breeding sows declined by an even higher degree, 14 
percent.  At the end of December, there were 1.2 million sheep, 29 
percent less than at the end of 1992.  The number of ewes declined 
by 33 percent.  Poultry numbers indicate a decline of 15 percent 
compared to the previous year.  (Budapest MTI in English 0716 GMT 10 
Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN BANKS TO FINANCE M1/M15 HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION:  Deutsche 
Bank, Commerzbank, Dresdner Bank, and KFW, the German Institution 
for Reconstruction Credit, will be involved in the financing of the 
extension of the M1 motorway and the construction of the M15, KFW 
announced.  The European Bank for Reconstruction and Development 
(EBRD) and a group of western banks lead by the EBRD and Banque 
Nationale de Paris will set up an ECU 189 million fund to finance 
part of the 40 billion forint construction project.  One third of 
the amount to go into the fund will come from the German banks, KFW 
said.  The high level of German involvement reflects the importance 
placed on the development of the M1 in German financial circles. 
The M1, which at present runs from Budapest to Gyor, will be 
extended to the Austrian border at Hegyeshalom.  This will involve 
the construction of 48km of new motorway.  The M15, a 15km spur, 
will connect the M1 with the Slovak border near Bratislava. 
Contruction is scheduled for completion by the end of 1995. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1727 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   CONTRACT SIGNED ON AUSTRIAN-HUNGARIAN GAS PIPELINE:  A contract 
was signed between the Austrian company OMV and the Hungarian oil 
and gas company (MOL RT) on the construction of a gas pipeline to 
link Baumgarten in Austria and Gyor in western Hungary. 
Construction of the 120km pipeline, to be known as Hungaria-Austria 
Gasleitung (HAG), will begin this March and is scheduled for 
completion by October 1, 1996.  The pipeline will have an annual 
capacity of 4.5 billion cubic meters and will be linked to Hungary's 
existing high-pressure gas pipeline near Gyor.  The construction of 
the pipeline will, for the first time, give Hungary access to gas 
from the West and open new markets to Western European gas producers 
and suppliers.  The pipeline will also safeguard gas supplies from 
Russia to Austria and Western Europe as gas can be delivered through 
HAG if there are any problems with existing pipelines through 
Slovakia, which are currently operating at maximum capacity.  The 
Austrian company will finance the construction of the 50km Austrian 
section of the pipeline and MOL RT the Hungarian section.  The 
precise means of financing is still uncertain and information on the 
cost of construction was not disclosed.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1447 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   CHINOIN EMPLOYEE PARTICIPATION IN FRENCH PRIVATIZATION: 
Employees of Budapest's mainly French-owned Chinoin Co. were able to 
buy shares when the mostly state-owned Elf Aquitaine petroleum group 
was privatized.  The French state held 51 percent of the petroleum 
company, a Chinoin official said.  Employees of firms belonging to 
the oil company had priority in the sale of French state stakes. 
Shares were sold for 385 francs, below the stock-exchange price of 
420 francs.  Workers at Elf member companies and subsidiaries, 
including Chinoin, could buy shares at 20 percent discount.  With 
Finance Ministry clearance, 108 Chinoin employees with hard-currency 
accounts and several French citizens working there applied to buy 
3,000 shares worth 924,000 francs.  In return for the preferences, 
they cannot sell their shares or get a dividend for three years (to 
be invested by a French fund).  Elf Aquitaine is one of the largest 
companies in France, with an annual turnover of 200 billion francs. 
It mainly produces and refines petroleum, but it also processes 
-chemicals, and is involved in medical and cosmetics production as 
Elf Sanofi.  (Budapest MTI in English 1540 GMT 14 Feb 94 AU) 

   AGREEMENT ON PROTECTION OF WINE BRANDS COMES INTO FORCE: 
Parliament approved a resolution on the promulgation of the 
agreement signed in Brussels last November on the mutual protection 
and control of wine names, concluded between the Republic of Hungary 
and the European Union.  The agreement on origin protection is 
closely connected to the Hungary-European Union Associate Contract 
that came into force on February 1.  The agreement ensures the 
protection of 437 Hungarian geographical names and approximately 
1,500 Hungarian wine names on the markets of the European Union, 
while granting protection in Hungary for some 6,000 wine brands of 
the Union's 12 countries.  The origin protection agreement is also 
related to the agreement signed on preferential wine trade, under 
which Hungary will be able to export some 263,000 hectolitres of 
wine to the EU markets under preferential customs tariff rates by 
1998.  Meanwhile, customs tariff rates on Hungarian wines will 
decline by an annual 20 percent, while those of European wines will 
decline by just 10 percent every three years.  The agreement also 
sets down distribution elimination, within 13 years, of European- 
made wines that have brand names resembling the "Tokaji" name. 
(Budapest MTI in English 2017 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   CHANGES IN FINANCIAL LEASING ACCOUNTANCY REGULATIONS:  The 
government has modified the regulations on the reports and auditing 
of financial institutions.  This completes the regulations on 
financial leasing laid down in the banking law for accounting 
regulations.  In the future, lessees will count items utilized under 
financial leasing contracts as assets, and they will be authorised 
to account for amortisation.  Financial leasing ensures the right 
for property transfer or purchase to the lessee at the end of the 
leasing period.  According to Hungarian accounting regulations, it 
was debated whether in such leasing structure it is the leaser or 
lessee who has the right to count the item as an asset. 

   In practice, the leasers included the assets in their books and 
took them out of the books only at the end of the leasing period. 
In future, financial leasing will function as a credit, as a result 
of which the leased objects will have to be shown in the financial 
institution's books as receivables.  However, the same asset appears 
as an investment for the lessee, and must be registered in the books 
as a tangible asset (regardless of the fact that it is still owned 
by the leaser).  This regulation results in the situation that the 
lessee is able to amortize the leased asset.  A condition of 
financial leasing is that the asset must be bought by the financial 
institution on commission by the leaser.  If assets are received in 
any other way -- for instance the enforcement of mortgage right -- 
then it may be classified as operative leasing.  The earlier 
regulations continue to govern this type of transaction, which means 
that in the case of operative leasing, it is the leaser who 
registers the leased asset in his books.  As financial leasing is a 
banking activity, it may basically only be practiced by banks.  The 
license of leasing companies is only valid for operative leasing, 
and a permit from the banking supervision is neccessary for them to 
practice financial leasing.  (Budapest MTI in English 0910 GMT 15 
Feb 94 AU) 

   STATISTICS ON 1993 TOURISM:  Almost 41 million foreigners visited 
Hungary last year, 21 percent more than a year ago, the Central 
Statistical Office reported.  Half the visitors came from the former 
Yugoslav republics and Romania, mostly for purposes other than 
tourism.  The number of visitors from the former Soviet republics, 
showing the sharpest increase, was up 2.7 million.  Following 1992's 
decline, arrivals from Germany grew by 23 percent, but fewer 
visitors were from the Czech Republic, Slovakia, and Poland.  Fifty- 
six percent -- 23 million people -- were tourists spending at least 
a night in Hungary.  Their number increased by 13 percent last year. 
About 12 million travellers, including over 6 million from former 
Yugoslavia, spent less than a day here.  Tourists in Hungary spent 
altogether 144 million nights, 37 percent more than the 1992 figure. 
Their average stay here was 6.3 nights, as compared to 5.2 a year 
before.  Visitors from Romania and the Commonwealth of Independent 
States stayed in Hungary longer than previously.  Canadians spent 
the longest time here, at two weeks, with the shortest time, three 
nights, being spent by former Yugoslav citizens.  Hungarians 
travelled abroad 12.1 million times, five percent less than in 1992, 
with half of them crossing the Austrian border.  Slightly more 
Hungarians left for Austria, Slovenia, Croatia, and Ukraine than a 
year before, but the number of Hungarians heading for Serbia 
plummeted by 63 percent.  (Budapest MTI in English 1227 GMT 9 Feb 94 
AU) 

   TOURISM REVENUE SURPLUS DECLINES:  The revenue surplus of tourism 
declined to a significant degree last year.  Although the latest 
figures show the situation up to the end of November only, it is 
clear that the surplus fell by some $150 million as compared to 
1992.  Officials of the Hungarian National Bank (MNB) said that 
tourism revenues totalled $1,088.8 million by November 30, 1993, 
which is a 5 percent decline as compared to the corresponding period 
of 1992.  Tourism expenditures totalled $650.2 million, which is a 
rise of 18 percent.  The surplus thus totalled $438.6 million over 
the first 11 months of 1993, as compared to $591.5 million for the 
January-November period of 1992.  (Budapest MTI in English 1100 GMT 
10 Feb 94 AU) 

   PARTICIPATION IN EUREKA PROGRAMS:  Hungarian experts are 
participating in 23 scientific research programs included in the 
international European Research Coordination Agency's (EUREKA) 
program.  The Hungarian state provided 230 million forints (approx. 
$2.3 million) in support to the programs in 1992 and 1993.  Fifteen 
Hungarian research institutes and 13 companies are participants of 
the programs, which run with a total budget of about 400 million 
European currency unit (ECU), and several hundred Hungarian 
companies are indirectly interested in the research.  The EUREKA 
scientific research and development program was set up in June 1985. 
The aim was for participating countries to increase their economic 
competitiveness and to cut back their arrears compared with the 
United States and Japan.  The major cooperation areas are 
telecommunications, environmental protection, laser technology, 
automatization, space research, transport technology, and energy 
management.  At present, more than 20 countries participate in some 
800 various EUREKA programs, under a budget of about ECU 14 billion. 

   Hungary had participated in six EUREKA research programs since 
1988, as a non-member state.  Hungarian researchers achieved 
outstanding results in three areas initiated by French scientists: 
The Eurotrack environmental cooperation, the Tor program researching 
the ozone layer, and in the Biotex program investigation the 
connection between the biosphere and the atmosphere.  In May 1992, 
Hungary was the first of the Central European countries to become a 
member of EUREKA.  Hungarian researchers participated in 10 programs 
in 1992, 15 in 1993, and are now engaged in 23 schemes.  The largest 
and most costly of these are the examination of high-capacity lasers 
in laser technology, the development of simulators of industrial 
processes that endanger the environment, the development of self- 
propelled space robots for space research, and the development of 
technologies for the maintenance and renovation of monuments. 
Hungarian experts cooperate with French, German, Italian, and 
Swedish researchers in most of the EUREKA programs.  The world's 
largest firms also participate in the 23 research schemes running 
with Hungarian participation, including the French pharmaceutic firm 
Sanofi which has stakes in Hungary, or the world telecommunications 
giant Sony.  The Hungarian government has, through competitions, 
provided 230 million forints in support to the Hungarian 
participants since May, 1992.  (Budapest MTI in English 0812 GMT 10 
Feb 94 AU) 

   POLAND 

   NATIONAL CHAMBER OF COMMERCE'S FIFTH YEAR:  The National Chamber 
of Commerce (KIG) was formed in 1990 with a membership consisting of 
13 industry-commerce chambers and also of economic societies. 
Today, KIG unites over 130 such chambers of commerce, which together 
assemble about 500,000 economic units. One of the main aims of the 
organization is the promotion of the Polish economy.  (Warsaw GAZETA 
PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 8, 22-28 Feb 94 p 1) 

   TRADE WITH SAXONY:  A Polish-Saxon working group discussed the 
possibility of enlarging the scope of its cooperation.  Polish-Saxon 
trade amounted to 429 million DM in 1992, of which the Polish 
exports accounted for 227 million DM, and Polish imports 192 million 
DM.  Polish-Saxon trade constitutes a full 30 percent of the sales 
between Poland and the Germany.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I 
HANDLOWA in Polish No 8, 22-28 Feb 94 p 1) 

   PRIVATIZATION OF GOPLANA:  The privatization of the Goplana Sugar 
Plants in Poznan is completed.  The Poznan voivode has moved the 
property of this state enterprise to a new corporation, which is now 
known as GOPLANA S.A.  Its owners are: the State Treasury and 
Nestle, each with 47 percent of the shares, and GOPLANA employees, 
with 6 percent of the shares.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA 
in Polish No 8, 22-28 Feb 94 p 1) 

   ENERGY COSTS NOT AS EXPENSIVE:  The price hikes planned for this 
year for energy-transfer carriers will be less than expected in the 
draft budget law by several percentage points.  The results of 
discussions between the ministries of finance and industry call for 
the price hikes to be distributed in three, relatively milder, 
stages than previously expected.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I 
HANDLOWA in Polish No 6, 9-15 Feb 94 p 1) 

   SHARES IN POLIFARB CARBOLINE:  The nominal capital of the company 
established by Polifarb Cieszyn S.A. and Carboline Co. amounts to 20 
billion zlotys and both partners will have equal shares in the new 
company. The agreement foresees an intensification of exports to 
both East and West European countries, as well as a substantial 
improvement in the quality of the anticorrosive coating produced in 
Cieszyn.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 6, 9-15 
Feb 94 p 1) 

   SHIP FOR FRANCE:  The French shipowner Luis Dreyfus commissioned 
the Gdansk Shipyards to construct the bulk cargo ship Gerard L.D., 
which recently set off on its trail run on the Baltic.  The bulk 
cargo ship has a load-carrying capacity of 165,000 tons and is able 
to carry grain, coal, ore, and cement.  In the last several years, 
the Gdansk Shipyards have built eight ships for the French 
shipowner, and lately signed yet another contract for two more bulk 
cargo ships.  (Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 7, 
15-21 Feb 94 p 1) 

   GERMAN COOPERATION WITH NOBILES:  The German company Herberts, a 
leading producer of automotive varnishes, has signed a letter of 
intention with the Nobiles Varnish Factory in Kujawy.  The intent is 
to open a joint venture company as soon as it is possible.  Herberts 
has about 20 firms throughout the world, and every third automobile 
in Europe uses its varnish.  The Kujawy factory was selected based 
on a high evaluation of its technical capabilities.  (Warsaw GAZETA 
PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 7, 15-21 Feb 94 p 1) 

   SUGAR INDUSTRY PRIVATIZATION:  NSZZ Rural Solidarity has prepared 
a plan for privatizing the sugar industry, which assumes the 
establishment of one holding company for the entire country in 
charge of administering all sugar plants.  In addition to the sugar 
plants, banks, foreign trade enterprises, and manufacturers of beet 
processing systems will also be able to be part of the company. 
(Warsaw GAZETA PRZEMYSLOWA I HANDLOWA in Polish No 7, 15-21 Feb 94 p 
1) 

   FOREIGN CREDITS AVAILABLE, NOT ALWAYS USABLE:  Of the total of 
$7.25 million in foreign credits available to Poland, only $2.93 
million have been actually drawn, according to a Central Planning 
Office report.  The report says that the use of foreign credits 
could be better. The main reasons for their underutilization are 
various restrictive clauses applied by lending institutions, time- 
consuming procedures applied by the administration and banks in the 
lender countries, and a reluctance to invest on the part of Polish 
enterprises.  The report notes an increasing interest in drawing 
foreign credits since the middle of last year, suggesting an 
improvement in the financial condition of Polish firms.  So far, the 
bulk of credits has come from the World Bank, European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development, European Investment Bank, Norway, 
and Germany.  The lowest use has been made of credits provided by 
the United States and South Korea.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1846 GMT 
24 Feb 94 AU) 

   IRISH BUSINESSMEN PROBE POLISH MARKET:  A trade mission from 
Ireland ended a four-day visit to Poland on 24 February. Businessmen 
representing different sectors of the Irish economy sought to 
establish contacts with Polish producers, and were also interested 
in selling their products on the Polish market, the British Embassy 
announced.  The Irish entrepreneurs offered office equipment; 
electronic products; devices for the oil industry; water treatment 
installations; and machines for linen, jute and sisal processing, 
among other items.  The businessmen were interested in finding 
distributors for their products and also wanted to learn about 
Polish taxes, customs regulations and import quotas.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1935 GMT 24 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE WITH ITALY INCREASING:  In 1993, Italian imports of Polish 
goods rose by 73 percent, while Polish imports of Italian goods 
skyrocketed by 129 percent, Trade Attache Tomasz Bartoszewicz of the 
Polish Embassy in Rome said at a press conference there. 
Bartoszewicz cited the latest sales figures of the Italian Ministry 
of Foreign Trade.  Close to fifty percent of the trade between 
Poland and Italy is carried out on a joint-venture basis, mainly 
involving the automobile industry, which as Bartoszewicz emphasized, 
should be an indicator for Italian investors.  He confirmed 
unofficial information about the interest of the Italian railways in 
cooperating with the Polish railways.  Replying to questions from 
Italian journalists, Polish ambassador to Italy Boleslaw Michalek 
announced that in the near future Poland will ask the European 
Commission to accelerate the integration process.  He also 
emphasized that since the dissolution of COMECON, Poland has been 
able to redirect her economic cooperation, evidence of which is the 
fact that in 1992 and 1993 the European Union member-states became 
Poland's main trading partners (i.e. 58 percent of all foreign 
trade).  (Warsaw PAP in English 1247 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH GDP FALLS LESS THAN ELSEWHERE IN EAST EUROPE:  The fall in 
Polish GDP was smaller than in other Central and East European 
countries in the years 1989-93, thus producing more rapid economic 
growth, labor and social policy department director at the Central 
Statistical Office Stanislawa Golinowska said at a 25 February news 
conference devoted to social conditions in that period.  The 
analyses, conducted on the initiative of UNICEF, revealed that the 
socio-economic situation in Poland and the region was characterized 
by rising unemployment and a major fall in real wages coupled with a 
disparity between the poorest and the richest, growing 
impoverishment, and an increase of pathological social processes. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1250 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN INVESTOR TO BUY 75 PERCENT STAKE IN CEMENT PLANT:  The 
German Polen Zement Beteiligungsgesellschaft company intends to buy 
a 75 percent stake in the Warta cement plant in Dzialoszyno, Sieradz 
province, the Press Office of the Privatization Ministry announced 
after an agreement to sell the package was signed in Warsaw on 25 
February.  According to this tentative agreement, the Polish 
Ministry of Environmental Protection will have to grant permission 
for the German investor to buy the stake, while the authorities of 
the state of North Rhine-Westphalia have to approve credit 
guarantees.  Twenty percent of the shares will be made available to 
the cement plant work force, while the prospective investor has 
agreed to sign a social security package which provides for 
employment guarantees for three years, the maintenance of present 
social benefits, and wage growth.  The German buyer plans to earmark 
tens of millions of marks for the plant's modernization, the 
Privatization Ministry has said.  The annual production capacity of 
Warta, employing 1,784 people, is 1.2 million tons of clinker.  The 
cement plant is in serious financial trouble after it failed to 
repay credits for modernization contracted in the 1980's.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1906 GMT 26 Feb 94 AU) 

   EUROPEAN COMMISSION HELPS POLISH AGRICULTURE:  The council of the 
Agroline program, which is financed by the European Commission, has 
decided to appropriate extra an 19 million ECU for credits for 
Polish agriculture, program director Urszula Budzich said.  The 
council agreed to open the so called "packages of credits" that are 
to be appropriated for the purchase of agricultural equipment and 
machines.  Dealers offering agricultural equipment that is produced 
in Poland, the European Union and countries that take advantage of 
the PHARE (Poland and Hungary Action for Restructuring the Economy) 
program will be involved in this action, Budzich said.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1830 GMT 27 Feb 94 AU) 

   CONSTRUCTION MINISTRY RELEASES DATA FOR 1993:  According to data 
released by the Construction Market Department at the Ministry of 
Physical Planning and Construction, private construction firms 
accounted for 84 percent of the basic production of construction 
enterprises and employed almost 70 percent of the construction 
industry work force in 1993.  Investment outlays of enterprises rose 
by 18 percent in 1993 compared to the previous year, chiefly as far 
as the purchase of equipment and transport means were concerned.  In 
1993 people received keys to 85,900 apartments, 35.4 percent fewer 
than the 1992 figure.  According to Central Statistical Office data, 
707,000 persons were employed in the construction industry between 
January and September 1993.  The average monthly pay in the sector 
was 3,777,000 zlotys (around $174), and the number of unemployed 
rose from 236,000 in 1992 to 252,000 in 1993.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2103 GMT 27 Feb 94 AU) 

   URSUS TRACTOR FACTORY SIGNS DEAL WITH CREDITORS:  On 28 February, 
the Ursus tractor factory signed an agreement with 1,800 creditors 
under which the latter agreed to cancel 40 percent of the plant's 
debt exceeding 2 trillion zlotys (about $92 million).  The factory 
will pay the debt's remaining part in five years, with a one-year 
grace period, the factory's deputy financial director Wlodzimierz 
Tylman told journalists.  He explained that the factory would pay 
back its debts to about 1,000 smaller creditors within two months, 
as soon as the agreement comes into force.  From the second quarter 
of 1995 on, the factory will start paying back 90 billion zlotys 
quarterly to the creditors, including the State Treasury, which 
joined the deal.  The business plan prepared for the plant shows 
that it will be able to carry this burden, the deputy director 
assured.  The negotiations with creditors have lasted since May 1992 
and their success was determined by a good recovery program prepared 
for the factory.  The Ursus plant is now increasing its production, 
paying its current liabilities, and winning new foreign markets, 
Tylman said.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1710 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK WANTS THREE BANKS DECLARED BANKRUPT:  The president 
of the National Bank of Poland (NBP) on 28 February suspended the 
operation of two cooperative banks and the Wroclaw-based Dolnoslaski 
Bank Gospodarczy SA (Lower Silesian Economic Bank Inc.), and filed 
motions with the respective provincial courts to declare their 
bankruptcy.  During the suspension, the three banks are to deal only 
with liabilities connected with deposits, current accounts and 
refinance credit.  The NBP president also ordered the liquidation of 
the Poznan-based Merkury Bank SA through its sale to Pierwszy 
Komercyjny Bank SA (First Commercial Bank Inc.) in Lublin.  The 
Lublin-based bank is to take over all the liabilities and of 
Merkury.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1755 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   RUSSIAN COMPANY TO SUPPLY CARS FOR WARSAW SUBWAY:  After several 
months of negotiations, the Kolmex Polish foreign trade enterprise 
on 28 February signed a contract with the Vagonmash firm of St. 
Petersburg for the supply of 32 coaches for the Warsaw subway 
between June and August 1994, Warsaw City Hall announced.  Payment 
for the coaches, accounting for 70 percent of the contract's value, 
will be balanced with Polish goods.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2037 GMT 
28 Feb 94 AU) 

   INFLATION SAID SCARING FOREIGN INVESTORS:  There are foreign 
investors who are willing to invest hundreds of millions of dollars 
in Poland, but they are afraid of high inflation, government 
bureaucracy, and a poor flow of information, Marc Popiolek of the 
Financial Dynamics Public Relations Agency told a press conference 
in Warsaw on 28 February, while presenting the results of an opinion 
poll answered by Europe's biggest banks and investment funds.  In 
the opinion of 16 percent of the respondents, the prospects of the 
Polish economy are exceptionally good.  Some 75 percent considered 
them good, 8 percent as not bad and only 1 percent as bad, Popiolek 
added, stressing that the latter group had never been to Poland. 
According to Popiolek, 90 percent of the respondents considered the 
political situation in Poland as stable.  "Investors complain of 
difficult access to data concerning the Polish companies listed on 
the Warsaw stock exchange," Popiolek said.  Only 5 percent receive 
this information regularly, 38 percent receive it irregularly, and 
57 percent do not get it at all."  In Popiolek's opinion, Poland has 
an advantage over the Czech Republic and Hungary of being bigger and 
having a larger population, as all investments are much more 
profitable when there is a bigger market.  Hungary is perceived in 
the west as a country in a political mess, he added.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2041 GMT 28 Feb 94 AU) 

   RENOMINATION OF ZLOTY POSSIBLE NEXT YEAR, NBP PRESIDENT SAYS: NBP 
president Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz confirmed on 1 March that she 
wants the renomination of the Polish zloty to be held early next 
year.  Speaking on Radio Eska, the NBP president said that the 
postponement of the zloty renomination has also had positive 
effects, as it has given people a chance to get used to the idea. 
She added that the operation should be well-prepared, which requires 
a close cooperation of the NBP with all interested ministries and 
institutions.  She did not rule out that the NBP could allocate an 
additional 1 trillion zlotys ($46 million) to finance the budget 
deficit if the inflation rate did not exceed 20 percent in the mid- 
1994.  Gronkiewicz-Waltz said that the Polish banking system was 
facing a crisis at present caused by a faulty tax system, among 
other factors.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1021 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   WALESA, NBP PRESIDENT DISCUSS CRISIS IN BANKING:  On 1 March, 
President Lech Walesa NBP president Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz and the 
bank's first deputy president Witold Kozinski, who briefed him on 
the current crisis situation in the banking system and necessary 
measures to overcome it.  Gronkiewicz-Waltz and Walesa shared the 
view that the delay in appointing a new finance minister was 
disadvantageous for the functioning of state organs.  The president 
warned against a relaxation of the financial policy, which is a 
significant element of the success of the Polish reforms.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1231 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   POLISH, HUNGARIAN AGRICULTURAL MARKET AGENCIES COOPERATE:  On 1 
March, the head of the Polish Agricultural Market Agency Kazimierz 
Gutowski and the head of the Hungarian Office for Market Regulation 
Laszlo Rieger agreed in Warsaw to exchange current information and 
experience, the agency spokesman said.  He added that the talks 
between the two men focused on the forms, scope and sources of 
financing intervention activities on the agricultural market.  The 
two stressed that the intervention in both countries concerns, above 
all, grain, meat and diary markets, although the mechanisms fixing 
intervention prices are different.  The cooperation is to embrace 
issues related to granting credits to firms, the activities of which 
stabilize the agricultural market.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1621 GMT 
1 Mar 94 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK RELEASES 1993 TRADE FIGURES:  Polish exports in 
1993 amounted to $13.585 million, while imports reached $15.878 
million, according to figures released by the National Bank of 
Poland on 17 February.  This results in a trade deficit of $2.293 
million, which was the main reason for Poland's negative balance of 
payments in 1993.  Earnings from exports in 1993 were 2.9 percent 
lower than in 1992, while payments for imports were 17.7 percent 
higher.  The deficit in trade was mainly the result of a strong 
growth in the domestic economy combined with continuing recession in 
Western Europe, Poland's most important export market.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1700 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   INFLATION SLOWS, UNEMPLOYMENT GROWS:  The fall of monthly 
inflation to 1.6 perceiit was among the brightest spots in January's 
economic statistics, according to the Central Office of Planning. 
The most worrying trend was growing unemployment, which increased by 
75,000 people or 2.4 percent.  Other positive developments last 
January were a high production growth (by 9.6 percent compared to 
January, 1993) and a small budget deficit (0.5 trillion zlotys or 
about $23 million dollars).  The most important threats to economic 
growth at the present time are growing unemployment, a decline in 
the volume of bank credits available to enterprises, and an 
accelerating decline in housing construction and an increase in 
social tensions, said the planning office.  It also reported that 
real wages last January were higher by 3.6 percent compared to a 
year ago.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1733 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT REACHES 2.9 MILLION IN JANUARY:  The number of 
unemployed stood at 2.9 million in January, up 2.4 percent on the 
December figure, according to the Central Statistical Office (GUS). 
In January, the rate of unemployment was 16 percent, an increase of 
1.9 percent on December.  According to deputy labor minister Jerzy 
Szreter, the rise in unemployment probably had a seasonal character 
and should be halted in March.  However, he feared that the 
anticipated number of unemployed of 3.05 million at the end of 1994 
might become reality unless more money was allocated for active 
forms of combating unemployment.  Unemployment rose in 48 provinces 
in January, with the highest growth in Chelm (by 6.3 percent) and 
Krakow (5.3 percent) provinces.  The highest rate of unemployment 
was recorded in Koszalin province (29.3 percent) and Suwalki 
province (28.9 percent), the lowest in Krakow province (7.6 percent) 
and Warsaw province (7.9 percent).  (Warsaw PAP in English 1836 GMT 
15 Feb 94 AU) 

   FSO, GENERAL MOTORS DISCUSS COOPERATION:  The FSO car plant and 
General Motors, who have signed an agreement to produce Opel Astra 
cars in Poland, are now developing their cooperation in order to 
start the assembly of U.S. cars in Warsaw, FSO spokesman Andrzej 
Smolinski said on 17 February.  Representatives of GM, the leading 
firm in the production of car parts, Inland Fisher Guide, visited 
the Warsaw factory to discuss the details of cooperation.  Also, a 
GM delegation headed by its deputy president, David Harman, was in 
Warsaw a few days ago.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1947 GMT 17 Feb 94 
AU) 

   LOT AIRLINES REPORTS OPERATING NET FOR 1993:  For the first time 
in three years, LOT Polish Airlines has scored a net profit from its 
1993 operations.  The net profit amounts to 63 billion zlotys (about 
$3 million) and was achieved without any government subsidies.  LOT 
was losing on its domestic connections but made up for the losses 
with its European connections, especially those with Vienna, Paris 
and London.  Regular flights to and from London will most likely be 
resumed on March 28, when the summer timetable takes effect.  LOT is 
also expected to reach a final agreement on strategic cooperation 
with one of the major U.S. airlines.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2201 
GMT 19 Feb 94 AU) 

   DANISH BUSES ASSEMBLED IN KOSZALIN:  An assembly shop for Danish 
DAB buses was opened in Koszalin on 10 February.  This is the first 
DAB assembly line outside the company's main factory in Silkeborg. 
The first five buses have been bought by Koszalin city transport. 
Eight buses will be assembled during this year.  In three years 
time, 150 buses will leave the factory each year.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 201 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 

   CANADIAN FIRM TO ACQUIRE SHARES IN GLASS WORKS:  The Toronto- 
based International UNP Holdings Ltd. holding company will buy 53 
percent of the shares in the "Antoninek" glass works, near Poznan. 
The state treasury will keep 47 percent of shares.  Negotiations 
should be concluded in two months' time on the subject of an 
agreement on transforming "Antoninek" into a limited liability 
company.  The Canadians will invest 56 billion zlotys (about $2.6 
million) in the modernization of "Antoninek," improving the quality 
of its products and management system, and marketing.  They agreed 
that the management of the future company would be Polish.  The 300 
workers of the glass works have their jobs guaranteed for 36 months, 
the previous agreement on wages, housing and social funds will also 
be maintained.  The workers will probably have a right to buy 8 
percent of the shares in "Antoninek." (Warsaw PAP in English 1158 
GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT CHANGES BUDGET, AGREES TO HIGHER SPENDING:  On 11 
February, the government presented its own amendments to the 1994 
budget, deciding to increase budgetary revenues and expenditure by 3 
trillion zlotys ($129 million) each.  The cabinet approved the 
amendments, envisaging increased spending on science, culture and 
education.  According to the new draft budget, state revenues would 
amount to 613 trillion zlotys and expenditure to 696 trillion 
zlotys.  The budget deficit would stay the same -- 83 trillion 
zlotys. 

   Some 1.4 trillion zlotys coming from foreign assistance will go 
to the Foreign Ministry.  The Agency for Agricultural Restructuring 
and Modernization will receive 808 billion zlotys, 297 billion will 
go to the government reserve, 200 billion will go on research 
programs, the culture ministry and university education will receive 
100 billion zlotys each, regions with a high rate of unemployment 
will receive 70 billion, local government districts 27 billion, and 
the remaining 12.6 billion will go the state treasury reserve.  The 
increase in revenues is the result of higher profits of the National 
Bank of Poland, totalling 1.6 trillion zlotys and a new foreign aid 
payment from the German Government, totalling 1.4 trillion zlotys. 
The government is also expecting bigger revenues from taxes such as 
excise tax, but these would be balanced by lower revenues from 
excess wage tax.  To balance the losses the government decided to 
increase excise tax on cigarettes by 17,000 zlotys per 1,000 
cigarettes.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1307 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL-INDUSTRIAL BANK COMMENCES OPERATIONS:  The Bank 
Rolno-Przemyslowy SA (Agricultural-Industrial Bank) inaugurated its 
work on 11 February with an initial capital of 170 billion zlotys 
(about $7.82 million).  Bank President Dariusz Ledworowski told a 
news conference that the bank's main aim would be to finance 
agriculture-related industries.  The bank has no license for 
international transactions at the moment, so it will be represented 
by the bank of exports development if necessary.  Polish Foreign 
Minister Andrzej Olechowski stressed that the establishment of the 
Agricultural-Industrial Bank was the best form of assistance for the 
Polish economy granted by the European Union, as it provided 
capital, which Poland was short of.  Representative of the European 
Commission Rolf Moehler said he hoped the Bank would help organize 
an effective food-processing industry in Poland and consolidate 
Poland's links with the European Union.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2009 
GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   POLISH, GERMAN DISTRICTS SIGN COOPERATION PACT:  The union of 
municipalities in the western coastal region of Pomerania and a 
similar union on the German side, including towns in Mecklenburg- 
Vorpommern and Brandenburg, signed an agreement on cooperation in 
tourism, economy, and ecology in Szczecin on 12 February.  The 
Polish and German municipalities are going to establish a Polish- 
German trans-border organization called "Pomerania," comprising the 
regions involved and, later, also the Danish island of Bornholm and 
southern Skania in Sweden.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2102 GMT 12 Feb 
94 AU) 

   POLISH-RUSSIAN BUSINESS INFORMATION CENTER:  The "Inicjatywa" 
("Initiative") Center of Information and Business was opened on 15 
February at the Russian Center of Science and Culture to support 
Polish firms interested in investing on eastern markets and in 
cooperation with firms in the former Soviet republics.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 2132 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   ROMANIA 

   NEW BANK OFFERS BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES:  Scheduled for 1 March 
1994, the opening of the Bucharest office of the Romanian Inter- 
Denominational Bank [BIR] will offer new business opportunities in 
Romania.  Founded by the International Ecumenical Center, the bank 
has among its other founders representatives of all the officially 
recognized denominations in Romania, private persons and corporate 
bodies from all over the world.  "Just a few years from the fall of 
communism, this banking institution, the only one of this kind in 
the world, will tell mankind about the strategic and geographical 
place of Romania as a bond between East and West, between 
Christianity, Islam, and Judaism," said Ion Popescu, president of 
the BIR and director general of the International Ecumenical Center. 
In his view, "there are plenty of reasons to make the Romanian 
Inter-Denominational Bank a vanguard institution in Romania and a 
pleasant surprise for financial-banking circles." (Bucharest ROMPRES 
in English 0940 GMT 25 Feb 94 AU) 

   PROSPECTS FOR TOURISM IN 1994:  "The privatization plans for the 
tourist industry in Romania were hampered in 1993 by financial 
blockage, which affected most of those involved in the privatization 
program and by the absence of firm legislative measures," Minister 
of Tourism Dan Matei told VOCEA ROMANIEI, the government's 
newspaper.  Nevertheless, the tourist assets that passed into 
private hands last year stood at 22 percent of the total sold to 
private entrepreneurs in Romania.  The percentage includes eight 
hotel compounds, 20 hotels, six motels, 85 lodges, 25 mountain 
lodges, and 33 restaurants, totaling 9.6 billion lei.  Sixteen 
tourist ventures were listed for privatization through sale to their 
own employees.  Another 27 joint ventures were achieved with a joint 
foreign capital contribution of $118 million and investment 
requirements of $250 million.  Local investors took over 14 joint 
ventures with a total of over 10 billion lei in capital.  The 
recently established restructuring agency gives hope for a faster 
privatization process, the minister said.  With another 52 tourist 
companies to be privatized in 1994, state ownership in the tourist 
sector will be reduced to a half by the end of this year, the same 
source reported.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in?English 1000 GMT 25 Feb 94 
                                      ? 
AU) 

   SPAIN RANKS EIGHTH AS INVESTOR IN ROMANIA:  "Spain is currently 
the eighth largest investor in Romania.  The investment totals $35 
million and belongs to important companies," Antonio Ortiz, Spanish 
ambassador to Bucharest said.  He added that the Spanish Telefonica 
company had set up a joint venture with Romtelecom for the 
development of cellular telephone communications on the Constanta- 
Bucharest-Brasov connection.  "It is an important investment and we 
hope to mark progress in step with the advance of the economic 
reform" the diplomat said.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1012 GMT 
28 Feb 94) 
COOPERATION WITH LATIN AMERICAN STATES:  Talks conducted over 17- 
27 February by a delagation of the Romanian Ministry of Trade in 
several Latin American Countries have led to the signing of numerous 
cooperation contracts in such fields as car and farm machinery 
manufacturing, oil processing, iron metallurgy and transportation. 
The sides agreed on the supply of "Romanian products worth some $4.3 
million to Venezuela, such as Aro four-wheel drive cars, tractors 
and machine tools," according to Romanian Minister of Trade Cristian 
Ionescu.  The Venezuelan side showed interest in the manufacturing 
of Romanian coaches and buses and in iron ore processing.  Prospects 
exist for several joint ventures. Interest was also shown in the 
Venezuelan oil processing for which "a diagram is needed for a 
period of at least five years to ensure supply continuity and to 
cover the demands of the petrochemical industry," the Romanian 
minister said. 

   The visit to Colombia ended with the signing of a $26 million 
contract for assembly works of Aro four-wheel drive cars in that 
country, and the Colombian side showed interest in the idea of 
establishing several joint ventures in iron metallurgy, in rolling 
stock, and in chemical products and machine tools.  Under the same 
contract, some 6,000-7,000 Dacia cars are also to be supplied to 
Colombia in 1994.  The sides also agreed on the opening of a direct 
Bucharest-Bogota air route in cooperation with Colombia's Avianca 
Airlines.  Brasilia showed interest in Romanian oil and raw sugar 
and also in the purchase of Romanian Aro four-wheel drive cars, 
coaches and trucks, according to Cristian Ionescu, who also added 
that another clearing bilateral agreement was signed during the 
visit to that country.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0744 GMT 1 Mar 
94 AU) 

   FPS LEADER VIEWS PRIVATIZATION PROSPECTS:  In connection with the 
State Property Fund [FPS] privatization program for 1994, Emil Dima, 
chairman of the FPS Administration Board, said that by the end of 
1993, after only seven months of FPS actual operation, 270 companies 
had been privatized, of which there were more than 100 in December. 
Six hundred more are ready to go private, while about 250-270 are in 
the process of drawing up the required survey.  We expect some 1,900 
small companies, over 400 medium ones and 35 large companies to be 
privatized in 1994.  According to the fields of activity, 
privatization features: 280 small companies in industry, 1,036 in 
farming, 131 in the food industry, 141 in transportation, 100 in 
building, 215 in trade, and 27 in tourism.  The medium-sized 
companies to be privatized are:  Industry -- 193 companies, farming 
-- 19 companies, the food industry -- 60 companies, transportation 
-- 25 companies, building -- 42 companies, trade -- 52 companies, 
tourism -- 12 companies.  The large companies expected to go private 
this year amount to 35:  11 in industry, 18 in farming, 11 in the 
food industry, 1 in transportation, 2 in building, 1 in trade, and 1 
in tourism.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0939 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   IFABO OPENS IN BUCHAREST:  IFABO Bucharest 1994 is the first 
major technical-economic fair in Romania's capital, specialized in 
computer technology, telecommunications, and office equipment.  It 
is the result of cooperation between the Austrian Messe Wien 
company, organizer of major international fairs and congresses, 
officially represented in Romania by the Export Consult Company and 
the Bucharest Romexpo Commercial Company.  IFABO in Bucharest is the 
first of a series of specialized annual fairs in one of the most 
dynamic fields of the modern economy:  Computer technology, 
telecommunications, and office equipment.  IFABO Bucharest 1994 
meets all the world standards from a technical point of view. 
Covering 2,400 square meters, 50 companies are presenting the modern 
equipment of prominent companies in Austria, Denmark, France, 
Germany, Italy, Great Britain, the United States and others. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1045 GMT 1 Mar 94 AU) 

   MODERNIZATION OF BUCHAREST AIRPORT: Bucharest-Otopeni 
International Airport, Romania's main air gate, will soon have a 
major face lift.  Modernization is expected to affect not only the 
airport building but also the 760 hectares of runways and parking 
lots, and will be done by the Romanian-Italian Ital-Strade-CCCF 
company, winner of the 1991 tender.  Only 18 km away from the 
capital's center, Bucharest-Otopeni International Airport, built in 
the 1960s, was well regarded at the time from a technical point of 
view, as well as in terms of its traffic volume. After 1989, when 
many airlines considerably increased the number of flights to 
Bucharest, the Bucharest-Otopeni International Airport had to start 
modernization and increase its passengers and cargo volume.  Top 
technology for air traffic control and surveillance was introduced 
with repairs and modernization on the airport's runways and parking 
lots.  A new cargo area is being built, while a new wing to improve 
departure flow and a terminal for viewing airplanes are under 
construction.  The modernization of airport services, the 
improvement of specific equipment and buses, the training of staff, 
and the pleasant atmosphere all led to traffic through the 
Bucharest-Otopeni Airport increasing to some 2 million passengers in 
1993.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0811 GMT 2 Mar 94) 

   SHIPPING COMPANY SEVERELY HURT BY FRY EMBARGO:  The Danube River 
Shipping Company in Giurgiu, 150 km south of Bucharest, suffered 
losses amounting to over $7 million in 1993 because of the UN 
sanctions against Yugoslavia, company director Stan Bone told the 
press.  The company was forced to turn down several shipping 
contracts because transiting through this country has become very 
difficult and expensive, as every convoy must have a UN permit and 
must pay a substantial fee imposed by the Serbs.  (Bucharest ROMPRES 
in English 1806 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   RESTRUCTURING OF TEXTILE, LEATHER INDUSTRIES:  Some 6-7 percent 
of the 376 state-owned companies operating in the textile and 
leatherware industries are scheduled to be closed down in 1994.  The 
decision was announced by Secretary of State Sabin Virgiliu Adrian. 
The restructuring strategy, which is to be submitted to the 
government for approval in March, provides for the growth of the 
companies own development fund by raising their profit quota.  It 
also provides for exporting enterprises to have access to low- 
interest credits, and for bonuses for companies capable of having 
local raw materials and semi-finished goods account for 70 percent 
of their export products.  The total cost of restructuring the 
state-run companies over the 1994-96 period will amount to 175 
billion lei (about $118 million), which will be raised mainly from 
internal and external credits.  For the second stage of 
restructuring, from 1996 to 2000, credits worth 70 billion lei 
(about $47 million) are envisaged.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
1949 GMT 17 Feb 94 AU) 

   TRADE WITH AFRICA, MIDDLE EAST:  In 1993 Romania's exports to 
countries in Africa and the Middle East amounted to $660.43 million 
and imports were $732.54 million, according to Constantin Soare, 
head of the Africa and Middle East Department of the Ministry of 
Trade.  Although imports outgrew exports by some $72 million dollars 
in 1993, he emphasized that there is a conspicuous trend toward 
balancing the trade deficit, despite the sharp decrease in the 
export of elaborate projects, compared with the situation before 
1989. 

   Soare mentioned that Romanian exports to that area consist mainly 
of metallurgical products, chemical fertilizers, sodium products, 
timber, cement, window-glass, plastics, electric engines and 
generators, and household items, while imports primarily consist of 
raw materials:  crude oil, phosphates, manganese ore, natural 
rubber, coffee, and so forth.  The Trade Ministry official added 
that commercial agreements were signed in 1993 with Tunisia, Zambia, 
and the United Arab Emirates and that sessions of joint cooperation 
commissions were organized with Tunisia, Zambia, Israel, Iran, the 
South-African Republic and Jordan.  Constantin Soare also said that 
negotiations went on in 1993 to ensure the repayment of Egyptian 
debts to Romania.  Debts worth some $0.253 million were retrieved 
from Guinea, through the import of cocoa beans -- an action that 
will continue in 1994 -- while a timetable was agreed with the 
Zambian authorities for negotiations on the settlement of the 
bilateral financial issues; Libya paid back debts worth $14.3 
million and Iran $22.6 million in crude oil.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 0803 GMT 18 Feb 94 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT INCREASES IN JANUARY:  Romania's industrial 
output increased 1.8 percent in January 1994 compared with December 
1993 and 6.6 percent compared with January 1993, while consumer 
prices increased 4.9 percent, according to a recently released 
report.  Prices for edibles increased 3.9 percent, for non-edibles 
5.7 percent, and for services 6.1 percent.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 0755 GMT 21 Feb 94 AU) 

   S. KOREAN FIRM TO MODERNIZE PRAHOVA COMMUNICATIONS:  Romanian 
Prime Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu received Jang Ito Chung, president 
of the Korean Goldstar Information and Communication Ltd., in 
Bucharest on 21 February.  Positively assessing the results of the 
Romanian-Korean cooperation in telecommunications, the Romanian 
premier said Romania needed assistance in this important economic 
sector.  He estimated that Romanian-manufactured products under 
Goldstar license would be quite successful on the Eastern European 
markets.  A contract was signed with the Romanian Public 
Telecommunication Company on 22 February in Bucharest on updating 
the telecommunication system of Prahova County.  (Bucharest ROMPRES 
English 1905 GMT 22 Feb 94 AU) 

   MACHINE-BUILDING INDUSTRY REVERSES DECLINE:  After a continuous 
decline over three years in a row, 1993 brought a positive course at 
macro-economic level as an effect of revival of certain industrial 
branches, a report of the National Statistics Board shows.  With its 
over 300,000 employees, the machine-building industry, one of the 
basic branches of Romanian industry, has contributed 1.2 percent to 
industrial growth in 1993.  The material production rose, compared 
to the 1992 level, in the tractor, truck, automobile, and all- 
terrain cars manufacturing.  Although on the rise compared to 1992 
figures, industrial production is still below the level of 1989. 
For example, the 1993 production of machines and equipment 
represents 107.2 percent compared to 1992, but merely 50.5 percent 
as compared to 1989.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0911 GMT 10 Feb 
94 AU) 

   ECONOMIC DECLINE STOPPED IN 1993:  "The results of Romanian 
industry in 1993 are better than those in the previous year, but, as 
a whole, industry is far from flourishing," Romanian Minister of 
Industries Dumitru Popescu admitted in a recent interview.  The 
constantly positive evolution of industry in 1993 as compared to 
1992 had only one merit:  That of having stopped the economic 
decline, as pledged by Prime Minister Nicolae Vacaroiu's cabinet, 
Popescu assessed.  Industrial production in 1993 rose by 1.3 percent 
as compared to 1992, labor productivity by 8 percent, and the 
industry's share in the trade balance stood at $3.7 billion, that 
is, 80 percent of the whole.  "The elaboration of the programs for 
the restructuring of each sector and sub-sector was already 
concluded in 1993," minister Popescu said.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 0938 GMT 10 Feb 94 AU) 
   FOREIGN TRADE DEFICIT SHRANK IN 1993:  In 1993 Romania's exports 
for hard currency were worth $4,527.4 million, which means a 5.6 
percent rise over the previous year.  Imports for hard currency 
stood at $5,238.9 million recording a 3.6 percent drop as compared 
to 1992, daily TINERETUL LIBER informs.  Thus the trade deficit 
amounted to $711.5 million, which is $435.9 million less than in 
1992.  The structure of exports by main groups of goods was 
generally similar to that of the previous year:  About 95 percent 
are industrial goods, such as metallurgical products, chemicals, 
machinery and equipment, textiles, ready-made clothing, and leather 
products.  More than half of the imports were products needed to 
keep the economy running.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1632 GMT 10 
Feb 94 AU) 

   MONEY SUPPLY GREW IN 1993:  The money supply in Romania rose in 
1993 by over 103 percent, reads the weekly ECONOMISTUL citing 
official reports.  In 1993 the money supply reached a high of over 
3,800 billion lei.  The memorandum on economic policies agreed with 
the IMF provides for a tight control of the money supply as one of 
the weapons included in a global anti-inflation program.  Official 
reports say that about 30 percent of the money supply is represented 
by hard currency funds held by natural persons residing in Romania. 
The bolder tendency of the recent weeks toward an increased 
liberalization of the leu's exchange rate shows an effort to curb 
the "dollarization" process of the Romanian economy, assesses 
ECONOMISTUL.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1310 GMT 11 Feb 94 AU) 

   PREFERENTIAL FINANCING TO ENCOURAGE EXPORTS:  On 14 February the 
National Bank of Romania opened new preferential credit lines for 
exporters, a measure intended to stabilize the exchange rate of 
Romania's national currency.  Companies exporting a part of their 
production will be offered credit lines totalling some 40 billion 
lei, with an interest rate of 70 percent.  The preferential 
financing will further rise to several hundred billion lei, while a 
part of the costs would come to be supported by the Eximbank and the 
state budget, so that exporters will actually have to pay even lower 
interest rates, namely 50 or even 40 percent, said Romanian National 
Bank Governor Mugur Isarescu.  Preferential financing stimulates 
production, says the governor, including the export-oriented 
production, but the way to do that is not to subsidize the interests 
paid for loans, but rather that to increase the capital of the 
efficient companies. 

   The reason for that is quite simple:  Without a really positive 
interest rate, it is practically impossible to stabilize the 
exchange rate of the national currency against the dollar.  However, 
the companies do not even want to hear of more expensive loans, 
because their capital is very small, which compels them to borrow up 
to 80 percent of the money they need in order to function.  When the 
situation reverses, people will trust the leu more, daily ADEVARUL 
writes.  Actually, the process has already begun.  The Bucharest 
branch of the Romanian Commercial Bank alone is buying U.S. dollars 
from the population at a daily average rate of about $100,000.  A 
few days ago in Bucharest an exchange house sold dollars at an 
exchange rate of 1,460 lei, which is below the inter-bank rate of 
1,480 lei, an event that has not occurred since 1989.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 0947 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   GERMAN ENVOY VIEWS POSITIVE ECONOMIC TIES:  In an interview 
granted to daily VOCEA ROMANIEI, Anton Rossbach, Germany's 
ambassador to Bucharest assessed Romanian-German relations as "good 
and without major problems," after which he pointed out that over 
the past two years Germany was Romania's most important trade 
partner:  "In 1992, Germany covered about 11 percent of the Romanian 
total exports, being, at the same time, the major supplier, with 13 
percent, of Romanian imports.  This positive trend continued in 1993 
as well, when between January and November Germany held 14 percent 
of Romanian exports (worth $569 million) and 16 percent of its 
imports (worth $815 million).  Rossbach assessed that German 
investments in Romania could grow further if the issue of the right 
to land property were settled in favor of foreign investors. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1336 GMT 15 Feb 94 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA 

   NATIONAL BANK BONDS RECEIVE 'BB' RATING:  The U.S. rating agency 
Standard and Poor's has given the Slovak National Bank a rating of 
BB for its public issue of bonds.  This means that Slovakia is the 
third former CEMA country -- after the Czech Republic and Hungary -- 
to achieve such a rating.  According to National Bank Governor 
Vladimir Masar, the rating confirms that the republic has managed to 
achieve macroeconomic stability.  "This is an extraordinarily 
important step from the point of view of Slovakia's incorporation 
into the international financial community," he said.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   JOINT ENTERPRISES TO BE ESTABLISHED WITH CHINA:  The Martimex 
Martin shareholding company is ready to establish three joint 
Slovak-Chinese enterprises to assemble earth-moving and road- 
construction equipment manufactured by the ZTS Turcianske 
engineering plant in Martin.  The components will be imported into 
China and assembled there.  The Chinese capital should amount to 
roughly $2.0 million.  The annual turnover for the Slovak plants 
could amount to 300-400 million korunas (Sk).  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA 
in Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   JOINT ENTERPRISE FORMED WITH GERMAN COMPANY:  Representatives 
from the German Contitech company and the Slovak Vegum Dolne 
Vestenice shareholding company signed an agreement on a joint 
venture on 15 February.  The agreement involves the establishment of 
a joint enterprise to produce sealing sections and frames.  The 
joint enterprise has basic capital of Sk57.782 million.  Pressing 
and rubber-metallic products for the automobile industry will be 
manufactured in the enterprise, which employs 400 people. 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL TRADE WITH FRANCE SK13O MILLION IN 1993:  Trade in 
agricultural products between Slovakia and France in 1993 amounted 
to roughly Sk130 million.  Slovakia imports mainly fish, soya, and 
breeding livestock from France.  Slovakia mainly exports beer, hops, 
and food products to France.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 16 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   FRANCO-SLOVAK CHAMBER OF COMMERCE ESTABLISHED:  A Franco-Slovak 
Chamber of Commerce was established on 16 February.  The new 
organization plans to assist in developing relations between small 
and medium-sized companies in France and Slovakia.  It will provide 
information and documentation services as well as a consulting 
service, and will publish economic and information bulletins.  The 
Chamber is based in Bratislava.  The chairman of its administrative 
council is Vladimir Valach.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 17 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   MILLIONS OF DOLLARS DEPOSITED ABROAD ILLEGALLY:  According to 
financial experts, capital amounting to several hundred million 
dollars has been taken out of Slovakia illegally and deposited in 
banks in Austria and Germany.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 
17 Feb 94 p 12 AU) 

   JOINT ENTERPRISE ESTABLISHED WITH AUSTRIAN COMPANY:  An Austrian 
company, Rohrig Neudorf, has entered into a joint enterprise with 
Plasmet Vrable, which is part of the former Tesla Vrable company. 
The Austrian company's involvement includes a direct investment of 
Sk1O.5 million and a subsequent investment of Sk35 million to 
purchase new equipment.  A further investment of Sk3.O million will 
be used for repairs to Plasmet's premises.  The joint enterprise 
will create 50 jobs this year.  The company will manufacture 
metallic molds.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 17 Feb 94 p 13 
AU) 

   BELGIAN FIRM ACQUIRES MAJORITY STAKE IN ZILINA FIRM:  Eurofoam, a 
subsidiary of the Belgian Rectitel company, has acquired 51 percent 
of the shares in the Zilina-based Poly company, which specializes in 
transforming polyurethane.  Eurofoam is the new name of Schaumstoff- 
Chemie Holding, a joint enterprise founded in 1992 by Rectitel and 
its Austrian partner, Greiner.  The privatized company Drevonabytok 
owes 49 percent of the shares in Poly.  Eurofoam will invest two 
million Austrian schillings in new equipment.  (Bratislava NARODNA 
OBRODA in Slovak 18 Feb 94 p 4) 

   CUSTOMS ADMINISTRATION COLLECTS SK32 BILLION IN 1993:  The 
Customs Administration collected more than Sk39.2 billion last year. 
Revenue from value-added tax amounted to more than Sk32 billion and 
the revenue from consumer taxes amounted to Sk2.1 billion.  Customs 
duties amounted to Sk4.5 billion.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 
19 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   RUSSIAN FIRM BUYS SLOVAK AIRCRAFT ENGINES:  The Russian Yakovlev 
company has decided to purchase the DV 2 aircraft engine from the 
engineering plant in Povazska Bystrica.  It will use the engine for 
its YAK-130 training aircraft, which is not only intended for the 
CIS.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 19 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   210,000 HECTARES OF LAND TILLED BY PRIVATE FARMERS:  According to 
estimates, private farmers in Slovakia till roughly 210,000 hectares 
of land.  This is 12 percent of the overall acreage.  Most people 
make their living from agriculture in the Komarno, Levice, and 
Galanta Districts and fewest in the Martin and Zilina Districts. 
(Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 21 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION OF SMZ JELSAVA MAGNESITE PLANT APPROVED:  The 
government has approved a privatization project for the SMZ 
magnesite plant in Jelsava.  It will be privatized by a direct sale 
to a shareholding company made up of its employees and management, 
who will own 51-percent of the shares.  Almost 88 percent of the 
plant's employees are involved in the shareholding company. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 21 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   FOREIGN CURRENCY RESERVES UPDATED:  On 15 February 1994 the 
National Bank had foreign currency reserves of $330-350 million. 
Foreign currency reserves in the banking system as a whole amounted 
to $1.75-1.8 billion.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 22 
Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   ACADEMY OF SCIENCES ISSUES REPORT ON ECONOMY:  Following the 
breakup of Czechoslovakia, the Slovak Republic has maintained its 
level of price liberalisation and its trade relations, says a Slovak 
Academy of Sciences report commissioned by the United Nations.  The 
report, written for the UN Economic Commission for Europe, says that 
although complications are appearing in Slovakia's transformation 
process, no significant political entity sees them as a reason to 
interrupt that process.  Slovakia experienced a 3.7-percent drop in 
its gross domestic product [GDP], which the report's authors call 
"relatively favorable," as it was partly due to reduced industrial 
production responding to restricted domestic demand.  Though the 
state budget was drawn up balanced, the government closed last year 
short Sk22.6 billion ($684 million), or 6.5 percent of GDP -- one of 
the factors in "a disturbance of the inner balance of the economy," 
the report continues. 

   Slovakia's overall debt in convertible currencies rose to the 
equivalent of Sk2.9 billion at the end of 1993.  The government 
accounted for 39 percent of that, the central bank for 31 percent, 
and commercial banks and businesses for the remainder.  The 
government's net debt to Slovak banking institutions was estimated 
at Sk61 billion, and the public sector's growing indebtedness 
restricts banks and businesses and "prevents stronger support for 
restitution aims," the report says.  Slovakia's balance of payments 
is tied to the Czech Republic's because of the two countries' high 
degree of interdependence. Stopping the "unfavorable development" in 
this area -- Slovakia's clearing account deficit reached Sk5.4 
billion, the Czech National Bank reported -- will require measures 
to increase Slovakia's exports and decrease its imports with the 
Czech Republic.  (Prague CTK in English 2118 GMT 23 Feb 94 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT IN REPUBLIC DECLINES:  Direct foreign 
investment in Slovakia declined from $151 million in 1992 to $135 
million in 1993.  Overall foreign investment in the republic since 
November 1989 amounts to $366 million.  The largest investor is 
Austria, which has invested $87 million in 1,141 companies between 
1990 and 1993.  It was followed by Germany with $77 million in 743 
companies, the United States with $47 million in 161 companies, and 
the Czech Republic with $40 million in 666 enterprises.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 24 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   OPTIONS MARKET RECORDS SECOND HIGHEST TURNOVER:  Turnover on the 
Bratislava Options Market in the week beginning 21 February amounted 
to almost Sk96 million.  This is the second highest figure since the 
introduction of one-day futures in the middle of last year. 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   REPUBLIC GRANTED CREDIT OF $33 MILLION:  National Bank Governor 
Vladimir Masar and Japan Exim Bank Executive Director Yukinori Ito 
signed an agreement in Tokyo on 28 February on providing the Slovak 
Republic with credit of $33 million.  The credit is to be used to 
support small and medium-sized businesses.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 1 Mar 94 p 2 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES ROSE 16.7 PERCENT IN 1993:  Consumer prices 
increased by an average of 16.7 percent in 1993, and the cost of 
living rose by 15.6 percent.  The average consumer prices index was 
113.1 for foodstuffs; 115.5 for non-foodstuffs; 127.7 in public 
catering; and 119.6 in services.  During the same period, the 
average index among white-collar workers was 115.8.  It was 113.6 
for foodstuffs, 120.8 for beverages, 115.7 for non-foodstuffs, and 
115.7 for services.  The average index among farmers was 115.7.  It 
was  114.1 for foodstuffs, 118.0 for beverages, 116.2 for non- 
foodstuffs, and 116.2 for services.  The average index among 
pensioners was 114.2.  It was 110.7 for foodstuffs, 121.0 for 
beverages, 116.5 for non-foodstuffs, and 115.7 for services.  The 
prices of agricultural products in 1993 increased by 14.6 percent 
compared with 1992 and by 27.9 percent compared with 1989.  Prices 
for plant products, including fruit and vegetables, increased by 
14.6 percent in 1993 compared with 1992 and by 35.7 percent compared 
with 1989.  Prices for animal products in 1993 increased by 10.6 
percent compared with 1992 and by 22.2 percent compared with 1989. 
Prices for industrial products in 1993 rose by 14.5 percent compared 
with December 1992 and by 17.2 percent compared with the average for 
1992.  These figures were made available by the Slovak Statistical 
Office.  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 9 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   REVENUE FROM TOURISM UP 13.0 PERCENT IN 1993:  The estimated 
foreign currency revenue from tourism in 1993 increased by 13.0 
percent and amounts to $241 million.  These results, however, only 
take into consideration the revenue of businessmen registered in the 
Business Register, but not in the Tradesmen's Register.  (Bratislava 
SME in Slovak 10 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   TATRA AIR IN RED IN 1993:  The Tatra Air shareholding company was 
7.0 million korunas (Sk) in the red in 1993.  This information was 
made available by its director general, Dusan Podhorsky.  Some 6,610 
passengers traveled with the company in 1993, and 660 tons of 
freight were transported.  An analysis has indicated that the 
problem does not lie in the number of passengers, but in increased 
overhead, especially the cost of fuel and lubricants.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 11 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   TAX EVASION COMES TO SK4.4 BILLION IN 1993:  Tax evasion last 
year amounted to Sk4.4 billion.  This is double the figure for 1992. 
However, the actual amount is probably higher.  The authorities 
carried out 166,000 inspections in 1993.  Some 94,000 were oriented 
toward income tax, more than 6,500 were oriented toward value-added 
tax, and some 16,000 were oriented toward employment tax.  Most tax 
evasion involves consumer taxes, especially on alcohol and tobacco. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 11 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   INSOLVENCY CAUSES SHORTFALL IN STATE BUDGET REVENUE:  Arrears in 
income tax from legal persons amounting to Sk11.9 billion 
represented the largest shortfall in state budget revenue last year. 
Because profit taxes and employment taxes for previous years 
amounting to Sk5.7 billion were diverted to the budget, the overall 
shortfall is around Sk8.O billion.  This situation was caused mainly 
by enterprises' secondary insolvency.  The shortfall in value-added 
tax amounted to Sk3.0 billion; in consumer taxes to Sk4.7 billion; 
in income tax from physical persons to Sk2.4 billion; and in road 
taxes to Sk574 million.  Some Sk1O.4 billion less than planned was 
diverted into the insurance funds.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 11 Feb 
94 p 2 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENTS AMOUNT TO SK11 BILLION:  To date, foreign 
businessmen and investors have invested around Sk11 billion in 
Slovak enterprises.  Investments increased by Sk4.0 billion last 
year.  Capital has been invested in 5,143 organizations.  The 
investment is under Sk100,000 in three-quarters of them.  Only in 
1.6 percent of these businesses have foreign businessmen invested 
more than Sk10 million.  Almost one-quarter of investments come from 
Austria.  It is followed by Germany and the United States.  The 
Czech Republic is in fourth place with 12.9 percent.  Most capital 
was invested in the K-Mart, Volkswagen, Chemlon, and Tatransky 
Permon shareholding companies and in the Henkel-Palma, Molnlycke, 
Samsong-Calex, Ludova Banka, Kablo, Credit Bank, Hoechst-Biotika, 
and LIAZ Velky Krtis limited companies.  Most capital was 
concentrated in Bratislava, almost 59 percent, and in the Poprad, 
Hummene, Nitra, Stara Lubovna, Kosice-Environs, and Vranov nad 
Toplou districts.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 12 Feb 94 pp 1,3 
AU) 

   COMMERCIAL BANKS' CAPITAL AMOUNTS TO SK11.4 BILLION:  Apart from 
the national bank, there are 16 banks in Slovakia, 14 of which are 
authorized to conduct general banking activities.  The commercial 
banks' capital amounts to Sk11.4 billion.  They have equity of 
Sk1O.4 billion, of which Sk1.4 billion -- that is, more than 12 
percent -- comes from abroad.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Slovak 14 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK ISSUES FOREIGN CURRENCY PERMITS FOR INVESTMENTS: 
During the first nine months of 1993, the Slovak National Bank 
granted business entities more than 170 foreign currency permits 
enabling them to invest abroad.  Some Sk187.5 million korunas were 
invested in joint enterprises abroad during this period.  The Slovak 
National Bank also issued five permits for investments abroad in the 
form of shares worth Sk51 million.  Most Slovak capital is invested 
in Ukraine, the FRG, and the Czech Republic.  (Bratislava NARODNA 
OBRODA in Slovak 14 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 

   DROPOFF IN APARTMENT CONSTRUCTION:  The number of apartments 
under construction and completed last year declined compared with 
the previous year.  Cooperative housing construction declined most 
significantly.  According to an analysis by the Statistical Office, 
citizens prefer individual housing construction and their interest 
in modernizing apartments and in adding additions and extensions to 
houses and apartments has increased slightly.  The number of 
completed apartments fell by 14 percent last year.  Most new 
apartments were built in western and eastern Slovakia, while the 
fewest were built in Central Slovakia.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 
14 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 

   DOLNE VESTNICE FIRM TO COOPERATE WITH FRG COMPANY:  Preparations 
are well under way in the Vegum Dolne Vestnice shareholding company 
for a joint enterprise with the German Contitech company.  This 
year, they plan to produce foam rubber for the automobile industry 
and seals for pressure vessels worth at least Sk4O million.  The 
agreement should be signed this month and the new company should 
commence operations on 1 April.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 14 Feb 94 
p 14 AU) 
ELAG/23 March/ECONF/East Europe Division/ta 25/2007z mar 

